Alaska, session 34, SB56.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 07 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from the 02 general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2026 budget summary for the 03 operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes expressed for the 04 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026, unless otherwise indicated. 05 At the discretion of the Office of Management and Budget, up to $5,000,000 may be 06 transferred among appropriations within a department to address agency annual facility 07 operations, annual maintenance and repair, and periodic renewal and replacement of public 08 buildings and facilities as outlined in AS 37.07.020(e). 09 Appropriation General Other 10 Allocations Items Funds Funds 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 Centralized Administrative Services 106,034,000 12,092,200 93,941,800 15 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 16 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of 17 Administration's federally approved cost allocation plans. 18 Office of Administrative 3,540,100 19 Hearings 20 Facilities Rent Non-State 1,131,800 21 Owned 22 Office of the Commissioner 1,743,100 23 Administrative Services 3,217,600 24 Finance 25,085,400 25 The amount allocated for Finance includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on 26 June 30, 2025, of program receipts from credit card rebates. 27 Personnel 13,076,900 28 The amount allocated for the Division of Personnel for the Americans with Disabilities Act 29 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts 30 collected for cost allocation of the Americans with Disabilities Act. 31 Retirement and Benefits 22,522,700 01 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 02 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 03 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 04 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 05 Health Plans Administration 35,678,900 06 Labor Agreements 37,500 07 Miscellaneous Items 08 Shared Services of Alaska 17,295,900 9,325,400 7,970,500 09 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 10 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts and general fund program receipts 11 collected in the Department of Administration's federally approved cost allocation plans, 12 which includes receipts collected by Shared Services of Alaska in connection with its debt 13 collection activities. 14 Office of Procurement and 4,805,300 15 Property Management 16 Accounting 10,106,600 17 Print Services 2,384,000 18 State Facilities Maintenance and 506,200 506,200 19 Operations 20 Facilities Rent State 506,200 21 Owned 22 Public Communications Services 879,500 779,500 100,000 23 Satellite Infrastructure 879,500 24 Office of Information Technology 64,602,800 64,602,800 25 Helpdesk & Enterprise 4,896,300 26 Support 27 Information Technology 5,487,800 28 Strategic Support 29 Licensing, Infrastructure & 44,088,300 30 Servers 31 Chief Information Officer 10,130,400 01 Risk Management 35,157,700 35,157,700 02 Risk Management 35,157,700 03 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 04 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of 05 Administration's federally approved cost allocation plan. 06 Legal and Advocacy Services 83,419,300 81,498,500 1,920,800 07 Office of Public Advocacy 40,612,100 08 Public Defender Agency 42,807,200 09 Alaska Public Offices Commission 1,272,500 1,272,500 10 Alaska Public Offices 1,272,500 11 Commission 12 Motor Vehicles 20,903,200 20,313,000 590,200 13 Motor Vehicles 20,903,200 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development * * * * * 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 Executive Administration 11,255,500 1,323,500 9,932,000 18 Commissioner's Office 2,277,400 19 Administrative Services 5,831,800 20 Alaska Broadband Office 3,146,300 21 Banking and Securities 5,239,900 5,189,900 50,000 22 Banking and Securities 5,239,900 23 Community and Regional Affairs 18,860,400 8,242,500 10,617,900 24 Community and Regional 12,651,400 25 Affairs 26 Serve Alaska 6,209,000 27 Revenue Sharing 22,728,200 22,728,200 28 Payment in Lieu of Taxes 10,428,200 29 (PILT) 30 National Forest Receipts 9,200,000 31 Fisheries Taxes 3,100,000 01 Corporations, Business and Professional 21,394,500 20,283,000 1,111,500 02 Licensing 03 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 04 balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts collected under AS 08.01.065(a), (c), and (f) - (i). 05 Corporations, Business and 21,394,500 06 Professional Licensing 07 Investments 6,007,600 6,007,600 08 Investments 6,007,600 09 Insurance Operations 8,958,000 8,384,300 573,700 10 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes up to $1,000,000 of the unexpended 11 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Commerce, Community, and 12 Economic Development, Division of Insurance, program receipts from license fees and 13 service fees. 14 Insurance Operations 8,958,000 15 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 10,086,900 9,861,900 225,000 16 Commission 17 Alaska Oil and Gas 10,086,900 18 Conservation Commission 19 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 20 balance on June 30, 2025, of the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission receipts 21 account for regulatory cost charges collected under AS 31.05.093. 22 Alcohol and Marijuana Control Office 4,768,500 4,768,500 23 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 24 balance on June 30, 2025, not to exceed the amount appropriated for the fiscal year ending 25 June 30, 2026, of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, 26 Alcohol and Marijuana Control Office, program receipts from the licensing and application 27 fees related to the regulation of alcohol and marijuana. 28 Alcohol and Marijuana 4,768,500 29 Control Office 30 Alaska Gasline Development Corporation 5,730,700 2,487,500 3,243,200 31 Alaska Gasline 5,730,700 01 Development Corporation 02 Alaska Energy Authority 22,510,300 7,300,800 15,209,500 03 Alaska Energy Authority 1,199,000 04 Owned Facilities 05 Alaska Energy Authority 14,666,200 06 Rural Energy Assistance 07 Alaska Energy Authority 233,900 08 Power Cost Equalization 09 Statewide Project 6,411,200 10 Development, Alternative 11 Energy and Efficiency 12 Alaska Industrial Development and 12,723,600 12,723,600 13 Export Authority 14 Alaska Industrial 11,921,100 15 Development and Export 16 Authority 17 Alaska Industrial 802,500 18 Development Corporation 19 Facilities Maintenance 20 Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute 26,556,500 26,556,500 21 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 22 balance on June 30, 2025, of the statutory designated program receipts from the seafood 23 marketing assessment (AS 16.51.120) and other statutory designated program receipts of the 24 Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute. 25 Alaska Seafood Marketing 26,556,500 26 Institute 27 Regulatory Commission of Alaska 11,175,800 11,023,000 152,800 28 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 29 balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 30 Development, Regulatory Commission of Alaska receipts account for regulatory cost charges 31 under AS 42.05.254, AS 42.06.286, and AS 42.08.380. 01 Regulatory Commission of 11,175,800 02 Alaska 03 Facility Maintenance and Operations 3,121,300 599,200 2,522,100 04 Facilities Rent State 1,614,500 05 Owned 06 Facilities Rent Non-State 1,506,800 07 Owned 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 * * * * * Department of Corrections * * * * * 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 Facility Operations and Maintenance 28,506,900 13,697,500 14,809,400 12 24 Hour Institutional Utilities 11,882,000 13 Non-Institutional Utilities 42,500 14 24 Hour Institutional 11,042,200 15 Maintenance 16 Non-Institutional 5,300 17 Maintenance & Operations 18 Non-State Owned Leases 2,000,000 19 Facility-Capital 1,745,000 20 Improvement Unit 21 DOC State Facilities Rent 1,789,900 22 Administration and Support 13,087,500 12,304,300 783,200 23 Office of the Commissioner 2,695,100 24 Administrative Services 5,709,600 25 Information Technology MIS 3,653,700 26 Research and Records 1,029,100 27 Population Management 316,306,100 307,924,600 8,381,500 28 Peer Support and Wellness 500,000 29 Program 30 Recruitment and Retention 707,600 31 Correctional Academy 1,907,200 01 Institution Director's Office 2,883,600 02 Classification and Furlough 1,634,700 03 Out-of-State Contractual 300,000 04 Inmate Transportation 3,037,900 05 Point of Arrest 628,700 06 Anchorage Correctional 41,372,800 07 Complex 08 The amount allocated for the Anchorage Correctional Complex includes the unexpended and 09 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of federal receipts received by the Department of 10 Corrections through manday billings. 11 Anvil Mountain Correctional 9,140,500 12 Center 13 Combined Hiland Mountain 19,664,800 14 Correctional Center 15 Fairbanks Correctional 15,889,700 16 Center 17 Goose Creek Correctional 52,028,600 18 Center 19 Ketchikan Correctional 6,148,900 20 Center 21 Lemon Creek Correctional 14,796,500 22 Center 23 Matanuska-Susitna 8,417,900 24 Correctional Center 25 Palmer Correctional Center 20,324,000 26 Spring Creek Correctional 29,330,600 27 Center 28 Wildwood Correctional 19,193,500 29 Center 30 Yukon-Kuskokwim 12,190,700 31 Correctional Center 01 Point MacKenzie 5,830,200 02 Correctional Farm 03 Probation and Parole 1,594,400 04 Director's Office 05 Pre-Trial Services 17,272,900 06 Statewide Probation and 20,137,200 07 Parole 08 Regional and Community 9,434,400 09 Jails 10 Parole Board 1,938,800 11 Community Residential Centers 14,651,300 14,651,300 12 Community Residential 14,651,300 13 Centers 14 Electronic Monitoring 2,960,400 2,960,400 15 Electronic Monitoring 2,960,400 16 The amount allocated for Electronic Monitoring includes the unexpended and unobligated 17 balance on June 30, 2025, of program receipts from electronic monitoring fees. 18 Health and Rehabilitation Services 84,179,500 78,091,900 6,087,600 19 Health and Rehabilitation 1,742,400 20 Director's Office 21 Physical Health Care 69,771,600 22 Behavioral Health Care 4,485,700 23 Substance Abuse 4,217,600 24 Treatment Program 25 Sex Offender Management 3,097,600 26 Program 27 Domestic Violence 175,000 28 Program 29 Reentry Unit 689,600 30 Offender Habilitation 2,469,700 2,313,400 156,300 31 Education Programs 1,013,700 01 Vocational Education 1,456,000 02 Programs 03 Recidivism Reduction Grants 1,766,700 766,700 1,000,000 04 Recidivism Reduction 1,766,700 05 Grants 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 K-12 Aid to School Districts 20,791,000 20,791,000 10 Foundation Program 20,791,000 11 K-12 Support 13,754,600 13,754,600 12 Residential Schools 8,535,800 13 Program 14 Youth in Detention 1,100,000 15 Special Schools 4,118,800 16 Education Support and Admin Services 319,066,600 71,550,400 247,516,200 17 Executive Administration 2,075,800 18 Administrative Services 4,235,600 19 Information Services 2,357,600 20 Broadband Assistance 21,001,300 21 Grants 22 School Finance & Facilities 2,988,000 23 Child Nutrition 77,345,100 24 Student and School 175,649,800 25 Achievement 26 Career and Technical 9,783,700 27 Education 28 Teacher Certification 2,520,900 29 The amount allocated for Teacher Certification includes the unexpended and unobligated 30 balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Education and Early Development receipts 31 from teacher certification fees under AS 14.20.020(c). 01 Early Learning Coordination 14,908,900 02 Pre-Kindergarten Grants 6,199,900 03 Alaska State Council on the Arts 4,202,000 913,500 3,288,500 04 Alaska State Council on 4,202,000 05 the Arts 06 Commissions and Boards 293,300 293,300 07 Professional Teaching 293,300 08 Practices Commission 09 Mt. Edgecumbe High School 15,917,500 6,230,900 9,686,600 10 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 11 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected by Mt. Edgecumbe High School, 12 not to exceed the amount authorized in AS 14.17.050(a). 13 Mt. Edgecumbe High 14,131,300 14 School 15 Mt. Edgecumbe Aquatic 591,700 16 Center 17 The amount allocated for Mt. Edgecumbe Aquatic Center includes the unexpended and 18 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of program receipts from aquatic center fees. 19 Mt. Edgecumbe High 1,194,500 20 School Facility Operations 21 and Maintenance State 22 Owned 23 Facility Maintenance and Operations 718,200 718,200 24 Facilities Rent State 718,200 25 Owned 26 Alaska State Libraries, Archives and 12,242,400 10,059,100 2,183,300 27 Museums 28 Library Operations 6,118,400 29 Archives 1,745,300 30 Museum Operations 2,545,100 31 The amount allocated for Museum Operations includes the unexpended and unobligated 01 balance on June 30, 2025, of program receipts from museum gate receipts. 02 Online with Libraries 494,300 03 (OWL) 04 Andrew P. Kashevaroff 1,339,300 05 Facility Operations and 06 Maintenance State Owned 07 Alaska Commission on Postsecondary 16,937,900 5,929,400 11,008,500 08 Education 09 Program Administration & 11,797,800 10 Operations 11 WWAMI Medical 5,140,100 12 Education 13 Alaska Student Loan Corporation 10,488,700 10,488,700 14 Loan Servicing 10,488,700 15 Student Financial Aid Programs 21,021,000 21,021,000 16 Alaska Performance 14,014,000 17 Scholarship Awards 18 Alaska Education Grants 7,007,000 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 * * * * * Department of Environmental Conservation * * * * * 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 Administration 13,854,600 4,628,400 9,226,200 23 Office of the Commissioner 1,359,400 24 Administrative Services 7,258,900 25 The amount allocated for Administrative Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 26 balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 27 Department of Environmental Conservation's federal approved indirect cost allocation plan 28 for expenditures incurred by the Department of Environmental Conservation. 29 State Support Services 2,236,300 30 Facilities Rent Non-State 3,000,000 31 Owned 01 State Facilities Maintenance and 883,800 883,800 02 Operations 03 Facilities Operations and 883,800 04 Maintenance State Owned 05 Environmental Health 29,721,600 13,677,400 16,044,200 06 Environmental Health 29,721,600 07 Air Quality 15,191,000 4,350,700 10,840,300 08 Air Quality 15,191,000 09 The amount allocated for Air Quality includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on 10 June 30, 2025, of the Department of Environmental Conservation, Division of Air Quality 11 general fund program receipts from fees collected under AS 46.14.240 and AS 46.14.250. 12 Spill Prevention and Response 24,310,200 15,188,000 9,122,200 13 Spill Prevention and 24,280,200 14 Response 15 SPAR Facilities Rent State 30,000 16 Owned 17 Water 30,732,600 8,411,600 22,321,000 18 Water Quality, 30,732,600 19 Infrastructure Support & 20 Financing 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 * * * * * Department of Family and Community Services * * * * * 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 At the discretion of the Commissioner of the Department of Family and Community Services, 25 up to $7,500,000 may be transferred between all appropriations in the Department of Family 26 and Community Services. 27 Alaska Pioneer Homes 112,906,000 63,920,200 48,985,800 28 Alaska Pioneer Homes 33,964,300 29 Payment Assistance 30 Alaska Pioneer Homes 1,876,400 31 Management 01 Pioneer Homes 64,109,600 02 The amount allocated for Pioneer Homes includes the unexpended and unobligated balance 03 on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Family and Community Services, Pioneer Homes care 04 and support receipts under AS 47.55.030. 05 Facility Rent, Operations, 12,955,700 06 and Maintenance 07 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 46,390,300 8,650,900 37,739,400 08 Alaska Psychiatric Institute 43,793,400 09 Facility Rent, Operations, 2,596,900 10 and Maintenance 11 Children's Services 200,416,300 116,946,300 83,470,000 12 Tribal Child Welfare 5,000,000 13 Compact 14 Children's Services 10,808,400 15 Management 16 Children's Services 1,470,700 17 Training 18 Front Line Social Workers 73,752,500 19 Family Preservation 16,632,100 20 Foster Care Base Rate 27,025,900 21 Foster Care Augmented 4,323,900 22 Rate 23 Foster Care Special Need 10,324,700 24 Subsidized Adoptions & 45,606,500 25 Guardianship 26 Facility Rent, Operations, 5,471,600 27 and Maintenance 28 Juvenile Justice 66,318,600 63,513,000 2,805,600 29 McLaughlin Youth Center 18,376,900 30 Mat-Su Youth Facility 2,885,500 31 Kenai Peninsula Youth 2,336,800 01 Facility 02 Fairbanks Youth Facility 4,680,500 03 Bethel Youth Facility 6,025,300 04 Johnson Youth Center 5,057,100 05 Probation Services 19,285,800 06 Delinquency Prevention 1,265,000 07 Youth Courts 492,900 08 Juvenile Justice Health 1,488,600 09 Care 10 Facility Rent, Operations, 4,424,200 11 and Maintenance 12 Departmental Support Services 33,831,600 13,476,100 20,355,500 13 Coordinated Health and 10,523,500 14 Complex Care 15 Information Technology 7,133,100 16 Services 17 Public Affairs 1,204,000 18 Commissioner's Office 2,450,100 19 Administrative Services 9,678,500 20 Facility Rent, Operations, 2,842,400 21 and Maintenance 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 The amount appropriated for the Department of Fish and Game includes the unexpended and 26 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts collected under the Department of Fish and 27 Game's federal indirect cost plan for expenditures incurred by the Department of Fish and 28 Game. 29 Commercial Fisheries 92,176,800 63,660,900 28,515,900 30 The amount appropriated for Commercial Fisheries includes the unexpended and unobligated 31 balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Fish and Game receipts from commercial 01 fisheries test fishing operations receipts under AS 16.05.050(a)(14), and from commercial 02 crew member licenses. 03 Southeast Region Fisheries 20,880,100 04 Management 05 Central Region Fisheries 12,980,500 06 Management 07 AYK Region Fisheries 12,394,400 08 Management 09 Westward Region Fisheries 16,600,800 10 Management 11 Statewide Fisheries 24,488,800 12 Management 13 Commercial Fisheries Entry 3,830,100 14 Commission 15 The amount allocated for Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission includes the unexpended 16 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Fish and Game, Commercial 17 Fisheries Entry Commission program receipts from licenses, permits, and other fees. 18 Comm Fish Facility 900,100 19 Operations and Maintenance 20 State Owned 21 Comm Fish Facility 102,000 22 Operations and Maintenance 23 Non-State Owned 24 Sport Fisheries 46,549,400 1,896,700 44,652,700 25 Sport Fisheries 46,310,700 26 Sport Fish Facility 218,700 27 Operations and Maintenance 28 State Owned 29 Sport Fish Facility 20,000 30 Operations and Maintenance 31 Non-State Owned 01 Anchorage and Fairbanks Hatcheries 7,527,100 5,586,000 1,941,100 02 Anchorage and Fairbanks 4,874,800 03 Hatcheries 04 Hatcheries Facility 2,652,300 05 Operations and Maintenance 06 State Owned 07 Southeast Hatcheries 1,346,800 1,046,200 300,600 08 Southeast Hatcheries 1,346,800 09 Wildlife Conservation 71,472,900 3,291,700 68,181,200 10 Wildlife Conservation 69,767,100 11 Hunter Education Public 1,285,800 12 Shooting Ranges 13 Wildlife Cons. Facility 400,000 14 Operations and Maintenance 15 State Owned 16 Wildlife Cons. Facility 20,000 17 Operations and Maintenance 18 Non-State Owned 19 Statewide Support Services 34,671,100 4,833,800 29,837,300 20 Commissioner's Office 1,595,100 21 Administrative Services 16,224,900 22 Boards of Fisheries and 1,423,500 23 Game 24 Advisory Committees 541,600 25 EVOS Trustee Council 2,405,300 26 Statewide Support 7,000,000 27 Services Facilities Rent State 28 Owned 29 Statewide Support 1,000,000 30 Services Facilities Rent Non- 31 State Owned 01 Statewide Support 365,100 02 Services Facility Operations 03 and Maintenance State 04 Owned 05 Statewide Support 102,000 06 Services Facility Operations 07 and Maintenance Non-State 08 Owned 09 State Facilities Maintenance 4,013,600 10 and Operations 11 Habitat 6,271,100 4,060,800 2,210,300 12 Habitat 6,257,100 13 Habitat Facility Operations 14,000 14 and Maintenance Non-State 15 Owned 16 Subsistence Research & Monitoring 7,489,300 3,329,600 4,159,700 17 State Subsistence 7,475,300 18 Research 19 Subsistence Facility 14,000 20 Operations and Maintenance 21 Non-State Owned 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Office of the Governor * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 Federal Infrastructure Office 1,081,300 1,081,300 26 Federal Infrastructure 1,081,300 27 Office 28 Executive Operations 16,680,900 16,466,600 214,300 29 Executive Office 14,084,500 30 Governor's House 804,800 31 Contingency Fund 250,000 01 Lieutenant Governor 1,496,800 02 Facilities Operations and 44,800 03 Maintenance State Owned 04 Facilities Rent 1,436,800 1,436,800 05 Facilities Rent State 946,200 06 Owned 07 Facilities Rent Non-State 490,600 08 Owned 09 Office of Management and Budget 3,483,900 3,483,900 10 Office of Management and 3,483,900 11 Budget 12 Elections 6,319,000 6,100,700 218,300 13 Elections 6,319,000 14 Commissions/Special Offices 2,989,700 2,837,800 151,900 15 Human Rights Commission 2,989,700 16 The amount allocated for Human Rights Commission includes the unexpended and 17 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Office of the Governor, Human Rights 18 Commission federal receipts. 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 At the discretion of the Commissioner of the Department of Health, up to $15,000,000 may be 23 transferred between all appropriations in the Department of Health. 24 Behavioral Health 39,872,100 6,797,900 33,074,200 25 Behavioral Health 16,384,600 26 Treatment and Recovery 27 Grants 28 Alcohol Safety Action 4,155,000 29 Program (ASAP) 30 Behavioral Health 16,176,500 31 Administration 01 Behavioral Health 1,942,900 02 Prevention and Early 03 Intervention Grants 04 Alaska Mental Health 118,700 05 Board and Advisory Board 06 on Alcohol and Drug Abuse 07 Suicide Prevention Council 30,000 08 Residential Child Care 1,064,400 09 Health Care Services 25,390,200 11,557,100 13,833,100 10 Health Facilities Licensing 4,549,300 11 and Certification 12 Residential Licensing 5,506,300 13 Medical Assistance 15,168,400 14 Administration 15 Health Care Services 166,200 16 Facility Operations and 17 Maintenance 18 Public Assistance 282,631,700 114,724,800 167,906,900 19 Alaska Temporary 21,866,900 20 Assistance Program 21 Adult Public Assistance 63,786,900 22 Child Care Benefits 44,319,900 23 General Relief Assistance 605,400 24 Tribal Assistance 14,234,600 25 Programs 26 Permanent Fund Dividend 17,791,500 27 Hold Harmless 28 Energy Assistance 9,665,000 29 Program 30 Public Assistance 12,024,100 31 Administration 01 Public Assistance Field 55,240,200 02 Services 03 Fraud Investigation 2,473,500 04 Quality Control 2,828,500 05 Work Services 11,842,700 06 Women, Infants and 23,359,300 07 Children 08 Public Assistance Facility 2,593,200 09 Operations and Maintenance 10 Public Health 144,385,800 67,690,600 76,695,200 11 Nursing 31,078,000 12 Women, Children and 15,087,600 13 Family Health 14 Public Health 3,631,900 15 Administrative Services 16 Emergency Programs 19,258,700 17 Chronic Disease Prevention 27,833,600 18 and Health Promotion 19 Epidemiology 19,411,200 20 Bureau of Vital Statistics 5,683,900 21 Emergency Medical 3,183,700 22 Services Grants 23 State Medical Examiner 4,242,000 24 Public Health Laboratories 9,408,900 25 Public Health Facility 5,566,300 26 Operations and Maintenance 27 Senior and Disabilities Services 60,079,300 33,374,200 26,705,100 28 Senior and Disabilities 20,289,100 29 Community Based Grants 30 Early Intervention/Infant 1,859,100 31 Learning Programs 01 Senior and Disabilities 25,251,500 02 Services Administration 03 General Relief/Temporary 10,154,700 04 Assisted Living 05 Commission on Aging 261,300 06 Governor's Council on 1,427,800 07 Disabilities and Special 08 Education 09 Senior and Disabilities 835,800 10 Services Facility Operations 11 and Maintenance 12 Senior Benefits Payment Program 24,013,100 24,013,100 13 Senior Benefits Payment 24,013,100 14 Program 15 Departmental Support Services 43,916,800 11,881,900 32,034,900 16 Public Affairs 2,137,200 17 Quality Assurance and 1,256,800 18 Audit 19 Commissioner's Office 4,816,600 20 Administrative Support 10,974,400 21 Services 22 Information Technology 18,037,100 23 Services 24 Rate Review 3,086,500 25 Department Support 3,608,200 26 Services Facility Operations 27 and Maintenance 28 Human Services Community Matching 1,387,000 1,387,000 29 Grant 30 Human Services 1,387,000 31 Community Matching Grant 01 Community Initiative Matching Grants 861,700 861,700 02 Community Initiative 861,700 03 Matching Grants (non- 04 statutory grants) 05 Medicaid Services 2,752,018,200 645,354,700 2,106,663,500 06 Medicaid Services 2,725,013,700 07 Adult Preventative Dental 27,004,500 08 Medicaid Svcs 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 Commissioner and Administrative 38,407,000 14,867,800 23,539,200 13 Services 14 Technology Services 6,712,600 15 Commissioner's Office 1,469,200 16 Workforce Investment 17,774,100 17 Board 18 Alaska Labor Relations 626,900 19 Agency 20 Office of Citizenship 445,700 21 Assistance 22 Management Services 5,128,200 23 The amount allocated for Management Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 24 balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 25 Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost plan for 26 expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 27 Leasing 2,002,500 28 Labor Market Information 4,247,800 29 Workers' Compensation 12,521,000 12,521,000 30 Workers' Compensation 6,879,000 31 Workers' Compensation 494,300 01 Appeals Commission 02 Workers' Compensation 795,500 03 Benefits Guaranty Fund 04 Second Injury Fund 2,895,500 05 Fishermen's Fund 1,456,700 06 Labor Standards and Safety 13,259,600 8,815,100 4,444,500 07 Wage and Hour 2,940,500 08 Administration 09 Mechanical Inspection 3,960,500 10 Occupational Safety and 5,786,400 11 Health 12 Alaska Safety Advisory 572,200 13 Program 14 The amount allocated for the Alaska Safety Advisory Program includes the unexpended and 15 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Department of Labor and Workforce 16 Development, Alaska Safety Advisory Program receipts under AS 18.60.840. 17 Employment and Training Services 57,352,100 5,678,000 51,674,100 18 Employment and Training 2,816,100 19 Services Administration 20 The amount allocated for Employment and Training Services Administration includes the 21 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years 22 collected under the Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost 23 plan for expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 24 Workforce Services 28,472,600 25 Unemployment Insurance 26,063,400 26 Vocational Rehabilitation 29,497,400 4,860,600 24,636,800 27 Vocational Rehabilitation 1,301,600 28 Administration 29 The amount allocated for Vocational Rehabilitation Administration includes the unexpended 30 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected 31 under the Department of Labor and Workforce Development's federal indirect cost plan for 01 expenditures incurred by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development. 02 Client Services 18,811,000 03 Disability Determination 6,437,700 04 Special Projects 2,947,100 05 Alaska Vocational Technical Center 15,586,400 9,492,200 6,094,200 06 Alaska Vocational 12,638,300 07 Technical Center 08 The amount allocated for the Alaska Vocational Technical Center includes the unexpended 09 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of contributions received by the Alaska Vocational 10 Technical Center receipts under AS 21.96.070, AS 43.20.014, AS 43.55.019, AS 43.56.018, 11 AS 43.65.018, AS 43.75.018, and AS 43.77.045 and receipts collected under AS 37.05.146. 12 State Facilities Maintenance 2,948,100 13 and Operations 14 * * * * * * * * * * 15 * * * * * Department of Law * * * * * 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 Criminal Division 57,977,500 52,016,300 5,961,200 18 First Judicial District 4,083,300 19 Second Judicial District 3,782,300 20 Third Judicial District: 11,607,400 21 Anchorage 22 Third Judicial District: 10,078,800 23 Outside Anchorage 24 Fourth Judicial District 9,544,800 25 Criminal Justice Litigation 5,898,600 26 Criminal Appeals/Special 12,982,300 27 Litigation 28 Civil Division 64,717,800 32,854,900 31,862,900 29 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 30 balance on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected in the Department of Law's 31 federally approved cost allocation plan. 01 Deputy Attorney General's 2,287,500 02 Office 03 Civil Defense Litigation 4,687,700 04 Government Services 4,744,500 05 Health, Safety & Welfare 13,553,500 06 Labor, Business & 8,688,700 07 Corporations 08 Legal Support Services 13,576,600 09 Resource Development & 11,284,400 10 Infrastructure 11 Special Litigation & Appeals 5,894,900 12 The amount allocated for Special Litigation and Appeals includes the unexpended and 13 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of designated program receipts of the Department of 14 Law, Special Litigation and Appeals, that are required by the terms of a settlement or 15 judgment to be spent by the state for consumer education or consumer protection. 16 Administration and Support 10,454,900 3,344,600 7,110,300 17 Office of the Attorney 986,100 18 General 19 Administrative Services 3,814,000 20 Facility Operations and 42,900 21 Maintenance State Owned 22 Facilities Rent State 1,053,400 23 Owned 24 Facility Operations and 335,500 25 Maintenance Non-State 26 Owned 27 Facilities Rent Non-State 4,223,000 28 Owned 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs * * * * * 31 * * * * * * * * * * 01 Military and Veterans' Affairs 56,265,600 18,227,600 38,038,000 02 Office of the Commissioner 7,584,300 03 Homeland Security and 9,778,500 04 Emergency Management 05 Army Guard Facilities 15,308,600 06 Maintenance 07 Alaska Wing Civil Air 250,000 08 Patrol 09 Air Guard Facilities 8,021,700 10 Maintenance 11 Alaska Military Youth 11,973,100 12 Academy 13 Veterans' Services 2,736,300 14 State Active Duty 525,000 15 Facilities Rent - Non State 88,100 16 Owned 17 Alaska Aerospace Corporation 10,535,900 10,535,900 18 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 19 balance on June 30, 2025, of the federal and corporate receipts of the Department of Military 20 and Veterans' Affairs, Alaska Aerospace Corporation. 21 Alaska Aerospace 3,911,600 22 Corporation 23 Alaska Aerospace 6,624,300 24 Corporation Facilities 25 Maintenance 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 28 * * * * * * * * * * 29 Administration & Support Services 36,286,600 19,508,500 16,778,100 30 Commissioner's Office 2,218,400 31 Office of Project 7,732,700 01 Management & Permitting 02 Administrative Services 4,573,400 03 The amount allocated for Administrative Services includes the unexpended and unobligated 04 balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under the 05 Department of Natural Resource's federal indirect cost plan for expenditures incurred by the 06 Department of Natural Resources. 07 Information Resource 3,891,400 08 Management 09 Interdepartmental 1,516,900 10 Chargebacks 11 Recorder's Office/Uniform 4,149,500 12 Commercial Code 13 EVOS Trustee Council 173,800 14 Projects 15 Public Information Center 853,600 16 State Facilities Maintenance 11,176,900 17 and Operations 18 Oil & Gas 23,626,500 10,848,400 12,778,100 19 Oil & Gas 23,626,500 20 The amount allocated for Oil & Gas includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on 21 June 30, 2025, not to exceed $7,000,000, of the revenue from the Right-of-Way leases. 22 Fire Suppression, Land & Water 94,276,000 71,371,400 22,904,600 23 Resources 24 Mining, Land & Water 35,288,300 25 The amount allocated for Mining, Land and Water includes the unexpended and unobligated 26 balance on June 30, 2025, not to exceed $5,000,000, of the receipts collected under 27 AS 38.05.035(a)(5). 28 Forest Management & 11,418,600 29 Development 30 The amount allocated for Forest Management and Development includes the unexpended and 31 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the timber receipts account (AS 38.05.110). 01 Geological & Geophysical 16,795,400 02 Surveys 03 The amount allocated for Geological & Geophysical Surveys includes the unexpended and 04 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 41.08.045. 05 Fire Suppression 30,773,700 06 Preparedness 07 Parks & Outdoor Recreation 21,144,300 12,889,200 8,255,100 08 Parks Management & 18,014,800 09 Access 10 The amount allocated for Parks Management and Access includes the unexpended and 11 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 41.21.026. 12 Office of History and 3,129,500 13 Archaeology 14 Agriculture 7,266,000 5,117,700 2,148,300 15 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 16 balance on June 30, 2025, of registration and endorsement fees, fines, and penalties collected 17 under AS 03.05.076. 18 Agricultural Development 3,473,300 19 North Latitude Plant 3,792,700 20 Material Center 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 Fire and Life Safety 7,566,600 6,598,900 967,700 25 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 26 balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 18.70.080(b), AS 18.70.350(4), 27 and AS 18.70.360. 28 Fire and Life Safety 7,133,700 29 Alaska Fire Standards 387,900 30 Council 31 FLS Facility Maintenance 45,000 01 and Operations 02 Alaska State Troopers 216,332,200 196,655,200 19,677,000 03 Special Projects 7,393,100 04 Alaska Bureau of Highway 2,798,600 05 Patrol 06 Alaska Bureau of Judicial 5,232,800 07 Services 08 Prisoner Transportation 2,035,000 09 Search and Rescue 317,000 10 Rural Trooper Housing 5,903,200 11 Dispatch Services 6,895,900 12 Statewide Drug and 10,992,200 13 Alcohol Enforcement Unit 14 Alaska State Trooper 97,875,500 15 Detachments 16 Training Academy Recruit 1,925,200 17 Salaries 18 Alaska Bureau of 19,325,600 19 Investigation 20 Aircraft Section 10,759,000 21 Alaska Wildlife Troopers 33,166,800 22 Alaska Wildlife Troopers 4,815,900 23 Marine Enforcement 24 AST Facility Maintenance 6,896,400 25 and Operations 26 Village Public Safety Operations 25,597,000 25,572,000 25,000 27 Village Public Safety 25,592,900 28 Operations 29 VPSO Facility Maintenance 4,100 30 and Operations 31 Alaska Police Standards Council 1,570,100 1,570,100 01 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 02 balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 12.25.195(c), AS 12.55.039, 03 AS 28.05.151, and AS 29.25.074 and receipts collected under AS 18.65.220(7). 04 Alaska Police Standards 1,541,100 05 Council 06 APSC Facility Maintenance 29,000 07 and Operations 08 Integrated Victim Assistance 35,225,400 18,731,200 16,494,200 09 Council on Domestic 30,466,400 10 Violence and Sexual Assault 11 Violent Crimes 1,854,100 12 Compensation Board 13 Victim Services 2,859,600 14 Administration and Support 15 IVA Facility Maintenance 45,300 16 and Operations 17 Statewide Support 59,244,300 40,402,800 18,841,500 18 Commissioner's Office 4,877,700 19 Training Academy 4,405,300 20 The amount allocated for the Training Academy includes the unexpended and unobligated 21 balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected under AS 44.41.020(a). 22 Administrative Services 5,946,900 23 Alaska Public Safety 10,049,000 24 Communication Services 25 (APSCS) 26 Information Systems 4,721,100 27 Criminal Justice Information 15,455,700 28 Systems Program 29 The amount allocated for the Criminal Justice Information Systems Program includes the 30 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected by the 31 Department of Public Safety from the Alaska automated fingerprint system under 01 AS 44.41.025(b). 02 Laboratory Services 10,601,900 03 SWS Facility Maintenance 3,186,700 04 and Operations 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 Taxation and Treasury 89,890,400 23,489,800 66,400,600 09 Tax Division 19,721,500 10 Treasury Division 13,005,200 11 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 12 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 13 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 14 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 15 Unclaimed Property 762,500 16 Alaska Retirement 11,782,900 17 Management Board 18 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 19 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 20 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 21 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 22 Alaska Retirement 35,000,000 23 Management Board Custody 24 and Management Fees 25 Of the amount appropriated in this allocation, up to $500,000 of budget authority may be 26 transferred between the following fund codes: Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 1017, 27 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 1029, Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 1034, 28 Judicial Retirement System 1042, National Guard Retirement System 1045. 29 Permanent Fund Dividend 9,618,300 30 Division 31 The amount allocated for the Permanent Fund Dividend includes the unexpended and 01 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected by the Department of Revenue 02 for application fees for reimbursement of the cost of the Permanent Fund Dividend Division 03 charitable contributions program as provided under AS 43.23.130(f) and for coordination fees 04 provided under AS 43.23.130(m). 05 Child Support Enforcement 28,622,000 9,218,100 19,403,900 06 Child Support Enforcement 28,622,000 07 Division 08 The amount allocated for the Child Support Enforcement Division includes the unexpended 09 and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the receipts collected by the Department of 10 Revenue associated with collections for recipients of Temporary Assistance to Needy 11 Families and the Alaska Interest program. 12 Administration and Support 8,943,600 2,492,400 6,451,200 13 Commissioner's Office 1,798,600 14 Administrative Services 3,512,400 15 The amount allocated for the Administrative Services Division includes the unexpended and 16 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, not to exceed $300,000, of receipts collected by the 17 department's federally approved indirect cost allocation plan. 18 Criminal Investigations Unit 1,416,100 19 State Facilities Rent 2,216,500 20 Alaska Mental Health Trust Authority 527,200 527,200 21 Mental Health Trust 30,000 22 Operations 23 Long Term Care 464,500 24 Ombudsman Office 25 Long Term Care 32,700 26 Ombudsman Office Facilities 27 Rent 28 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority 1,412,200 1,412,200 29 AMBBA Operations 1,412,200 30 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 116,307,400 457,000 115,850,400 31 AHFC Operations 113,698,600 01 Alaska Corporation for 520,400 02 Affordable Housing 03 Alaska Sustainable Energy 457,000 04 Corporation 05 Facilities Operations and 1,631,400 06 Maintenance 07 Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation 230,851,000 230,851,000 08 APFC Operations 30,739,900 09 APFC Investment 199,496,100 10 Management Fees 11 Facilities Rent Non-State 615,000 12 Owned 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 Division of Facilities Services 104,429,500 21,780,400 82,649,100 17 The amount allocated for this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated balance 18 on June 30, 2025, of inter-agency receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and 19 Public Facilities for the maintenance and operations of facilities and leases. 20 Facilities Services 58,859,000 21 Leases 45,570,500 22 Administration and Support 65,632,700 14,855,800 50,776,900 23 Data Modernization & 7,912,100 24 Innovation Office 25 Commissioner's Office 3,630,400 26 Contracting and Appeals 434,100 27 Equal Employment and Civil 1,466,800 28 Rights 29 The amount allocated for Equal Employment and Civil Rights includes the unexpended and 30 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the statutory designated program receipts collected 31 for the Alaska Construction Career Day events. 01 Internal Review 801,400 02 Statewide Administrative 12,973,600 03 Services 04 The amount allocated for Statewide Administrative Services includes the unexpended and 05 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of receipts from all prior fiscal years collected under 06 the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities federal indirect cost plan for 07 expenditures incurred by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities. 08 Highway Safety Office 895,000 09 Information Systems and 7,397,100 10 Services 11 Leased Facilities 2,937,500 12 Statewide Procurement 3,266,200 13 Central Region Support 1,653,000 14 Services 15 Northern Region Support 2,408,900 16 Services 17 Southcoast Region Support 4,269,600 18 Services 19 Statewide Aviation 5,858,100 20 The amount allocated for Statewide Aviation includes the unexpended and unobligated 21 balance on June 30, 2025, of the rental receipts and user fees collected from tenants of land 22 and buildings at Department of Transportation and Public Facilities rural airports under 23 AS 02.15.090(a). 24 Statewide Safety and 573,200 25 Emergency Management 26 Program Development and 803,300 27 Statewide Planning 28 Measurement Standards & 8,352,400 29 Commercial Vehicle 30 Compliance 31 The amount allocated for Measurement Standards and Commercial Vehicle Compliance 01 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Unified Carrier 02 Registration Program receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public 03 Facilities. 04 The amount allocated for Measurement Standards and Commercial Vehicle Compliance 05 includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of program receipts 06 collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities. 07 Design, Engineering and Construction 132,942,500 2,041,100 130,901,400 08 Central Design, Engineering, 54,888,600 09 and Construction 10 The amount allocated for Central Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes the 11 unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the general fund program receipts 12 collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or lease of 13 excess right-of-way. 14 Southcoast Design, 21,986,800 15 Engineering, and 16 Construction 17 The amount allocated for Southcoast Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes 18 the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the general fund program 19 receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or 20 lease of excess right-of-way. 21 Project Delivery 14,263,600 22 Northern Region Design, 41,803,500 23 Engineering, and 24 Construction 25 The amount allocated for Northern Region Design, Engineering, and Construction includes 26 the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the general fund program 27 receipts collected by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the sale or 28 lease of excess right-of-way. 29 State Equipment Fleet 39,948,600 30,500 39,918,100 30 State Equipment Fleet 39,948,600 31 Highways, Aviation and Facilities 174,608,500 136,029,800 38,578,700 01 The amounts allocated for highways and aviation shall lapse into the general fund on 02 August 31, 2026. 03 The amount appropriated by this appropriation includes the unexpended and unobligated 04 balance on June 30, 2025, of general fund program receipts collected by the Department of 05 Transportation and Public Facilities for collections related to the repair of damaged state 06 highway infrastructure. 07 Abandoned Vehicle 100,000 08 Removal 09 Statewide Contracted 915,500 10 Snow Removal 11 Traffic Signal Management 2,389,100 12 Central Region Highways 50,346,900 13 and Aviation 14 Northern Region Highways 83,454,300 15 and Aviation 16 Southcoast Region 28,439,600 17 Highways and Aviation 18 Whittier Access and 8,963,100 19 Tunnel 20 The amount allocated for Whittier Access and Tunnel includes the unexpended and 21 unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Whittier Tunnel toll receipts collected by the 22 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities under AS 19.05.040(11). 23 International Airports 127,019,700 127,019,700 24 International Airport 8,508,400 25 Systems Office 26 Anchorage Airport 7,161,200 27 Administration 28 Anchorage Airport Facilities 30,221,800 29 Anchorage Airport Field 27,123,800 30 and Equipment Maintenance 31 Anchorage Airport 9,399,300 01 Operations 02 Anchorage Airport Safety 18,458,000 03 Fairbanks Airport 2,651,800 04 Administration 05 Fairbanks Airport Facilities 5,921,400 06 Fairbanks Airport Field and 7,354,800 07 Equipment Maintenance 08 Fairbanks Airport 2,261,300 09 Operations 10 Fairbanks Airport Safety 7,957,900 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 University of Alaska 1,101,582,800 668,047,000 433,535,800 15 Budget 1,000 16 Reductions/Additions - 17 Systemwide 18 Systemwide Services 46,865,200 19 Office of Information 21,957,600 20 Technology 21 Anchorage Campus 281,135,800 22 Small Business 3,701,400 23 Development Center 24 Kenai Peninsula College 17,544,900 25 Kodiak College 5,981,700 26 Matanuska-Susitna College 14,428,800 27 Prince William Sound 6,779,400 28 College 29 Troth Yeddha' Campus 588,728,700 30 College of Indigenous 9,344,200 31 Studies 01 Bristol Bay Campus 4,083,700 02 Chukchi Campus 2,299,200 03 Kuskokwim Campus 6,085,200 04 Northwest Campus 4,872,600 05 UAF Community and 18,220,500 06 Technical College 07 Education Trust of Alaska 9,026,800 08 Juneau Campus 47,396,200 09 Ketchikan Campus 5,438,800 10 Sitka Campus 7,691,100 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 Alaska Court System 147,425,800 144,189,800 3,236,000 15 Appellate Courts 10,151,200 16 Trial Courts 122,591,900 17 Administration and Support 14,682,700 18 Therapeutic Courts 4,484,200 3,363,200 1,121,000 19 Therapeutic Courts 4,484,200 20 Commission on Judicial Conduct 613,900 613,900 21 Commission on Judicial 613,900 22 Conduct 23 Judicial Council 1,675,900 1,675,900 24 Judicial Council 1,675,900 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Legislature * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 Budget and Audit Committee 20,062,200 20,062,200 29 Legislative Audit 8,225,900 30 Legislative Finance 9,766,600 31 Budget and Audit 2,069,700 01 Committee Expenses 02 Legislative Council 33,342,900 33,117,500 225,400 03 Administrative Services 8,668,400 04 Council and Subcommittees 1,161,700 05 Legal and Research 6,731,100 06 Services 07 Select Committee on 350,300 08 Ethics 09 Office of Victims Rights 1,475,200 10 Ombudsman 1,864,600 11 Legislature State Facilities 1,630,500 12 Rent 13 Technology and Information 9,811,400 14 Services Division 15 Security Services 1,649,700 16 Legislative Operating Budget 38,694,200 38,674,200 20,000 17 Legislators' Salaries and 9,599,700 18 Allowances 19 Legislative Operating 13,343,600 20 Budget 21 Session Expenses 15,750,900 22 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Administration 05 1002 Federal Receipts 588,300 06 1003 General Fund Match 250,000 07 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 91,169,500 08 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 34,367,800 09 1007 Interagency Receipts 80,458,000 10 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 42,999,700 11 1023 FICA Administration Fund Account 220,900 12 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 10,327,300 13 1033 Surplus Federal Property Revolving Fund 698,800 14 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 3,965,500 15 1042 Judicial Retirement System 124,200 16 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia Retirement System 298,300 17 1081 Information Services Fund 64,602,800 18 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $330,071,100 19 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development 20 1002 Federal Receipts 42,438,000 21 1003 General Fund Match 1,275,500 22 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 15,489,300 23 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 11,784,900 24 1007 Interagency Receipts 17,500,700 25 1036 Commercial Fishing Loan Fund 5,043,800 26 1040 Real Estate Recovery Fund 313,000 27 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 17,223,600 28 1062 Power Project Loan Fund 1,039,900 29 1070 Fisheries Enhancement Revolving Loan Fund 713,000 30 1074 Bulk Fuel Revolving Loan Fund 64,400 31 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & Export Authority 10,072,200 01 Receipts 02 1107 Alaska Energy Authority Corporate Receipts 1,199,000 03 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 13,969,300 04 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska Receipts 11,023,000 05 1156 Receipt Supported Services 26,260,300 06 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission 9,081,300 07 Receipts 08 1164 Rural Development Initiative Fund 67,700 09 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 1,340,200 10 1170 Small Business Economic Development Revolving 64,100 11 Loan Fund 12 1202 Anatomical Gift Awareness Fund 80,000 13 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 1,464,100 14 1221 Civil Legal Services Fund 312,600 15 1223 Commercial Charter Fisheries RLF 21,700 16 1224 Mariculture Revolving Loan Fund 22,100 17 1227 Alaska Microloan Revolving Loan Fund 10,800 18 1235 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas Project Fund 3,243,200 19 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $191,117,700 20 Department of Corrections 21 1002 Federal Receipts 9,071,500 22 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 426,450,000 23 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 6,260,100 24 1007 Interagency Receipts 16,606,900 25 1171 Restorative Justice Account 5,539,600 26 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $463,928,100 27 Department of Education and Early Development 28 1002 Federal Receipts 245,389,400 29 1003 General Fund Match 1,346,800 30 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 100,160,500 31 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,115,900 01 1007 Interagency Receipts 24,933,300 02 1014 Donated Commodity/Handling Fee Account 524,800 03 1043 Federal Impact Aid for K-12 Schools 20,791,000 04 1106 Alaska Student Loan Corporation Receipts 10,488,700 05 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 2,805,600 06 1145 Art in Public Places Fund 30,000 07 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 26,847,200 08 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $435,433,200 09 Department of Environmental Conservation 10 1002 Federal Receipts 42,913,000 11 1003 General Fund Match 6,421,000 12 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 16,796,800 13 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 8,437,900 14 1007 Interagency Receipts 4,635,300 15 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust--Civil 7,200 16 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention & Response 15,484,200 17 Fund 18 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous Waste 429,500 19 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 6,105,700 20 1093 Clean Air Protection Fund 7,599,900 21 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 30,000 22 1166 Commercial Passenger Vessel Environmental 1,614,800 23 Compliance Fund 24 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 2,124,600 25 1230 Alaska Clean Water Administrative Fund 1,050,100 26 1231 Alaska Drinking Water Administrative Fund 1,043,800 27 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $114,693,800 28 Department of Family and Community Services 29 1002 Federal Receipts 86,394,400 30 1003 General Fund Match 91,055,000 31 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 144,707,900 01 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 30,743,600 02 1007 Interagency Receipts 90,852,300 03 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 753,800 04 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 15,355,800 05 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $459,862,800 06 Department of Fish and Game 07 1002 Federal Receipts 92,403,400 08 1003 General Fund Match 1,303,000 09 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 72,961,200 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,603,100 11 1007 Interagency Receipts 27,113,800 12 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust--Civil 2,582,600 13 1024 Fish and Game Fund 42,310,300 14 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous Waste 120,200 15 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 5,960,800 16 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 9,307,700 17 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 3,666,200 18 1201 Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission Receipts 7,172,200 19 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $267,504,500 20 Office of the Governor 21 1002 Federal Receipts 151,900 22 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 31,407,100 23 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 432,600 24 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $31,991,600 25 Department of Health 26 1002 Federal Receipts 2,354,363,400 27 1003 General Fund Match 801,807,500 28 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 95,211,000 29 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 15,199,300 30 1007 Interagency Receipts 49,283,800 31 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 17,791,500 01 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 2,418,200 02 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 32,845,600 03 1168 Tobacco Use Education and Cessation Fund 5,205,400 04 1171 Restorative Justice Account 210,400 05 1247 Medicaid Monetary Recoveries 219,800 06 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $3,374,555,900 07 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 08 1002 Federal Receipts 92,620,400 09 1003 General Fund Match 8,830,400 10 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 14,608,600 11 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 6,068,500 12 1007 Interagency Receipts 15,878,000 13 1031 Second Injury Fund Reserve Account 2,895,500 14 1032 Fishermen's Fund 1,456,700 15 1049 Training and Building Fund 815,500 16 1054 Employment Assistance and Training Program 9,793,000 17 Account 18 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 219,200 19 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 1,547,000 20 1117 Randolph Sheppard Small Business Fund 124,200 21 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 626,700 22 1157 Workers Safety and Compensation Administration 8,032,600 23 Account 24 1172 Building Safety Account 2,171,700 25 1203 Workers' Compensation Benefits Guarantee Fund 795,500 26 1237 Voc Rehab Small Business Enterprise Revolving 140,000 27 Fund 28 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $166,623,500 29 Department of Law 30 1002 Federal Receipts 2,452,300 31 1003 General Fund Match 631,300 01 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 84,567,700 02 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 196,300 03 1007 Interagency Receipts 36,239,200 04 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous Waste 598,700 05 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 506,500 06 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross Receipts 3,127,600 07 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 2,010,100 08 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska Receipts 2,725,900 09 1168 Tobacco Use Education and Cessation Fund 94,600 10 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $133,150,200 11 Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs 12 1002 Federal Receipts 34,582,000 13 1003 General Fund Match 9,191,700 14 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 9,007,400 15 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 28,500 16 1007 Interagency Receipts 6,658,800 17 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 3,777,600 18 1101 Alaska Aerospace Corporation Fund 2,919,400 19 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 636,100 20 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $66,801,500 21 Department of Natural Resources 22 1002 Federal Receipts 15,402,100 23 1003 General Fund Match 894,500 24 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 69,575,700 25 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 35,380,300 26 1007 Interagency Receipts 16,276,600 27 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust--Civil 173,800 28 1021 Agricultural Revolving Loan Fund 321,800 29 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous Waste 50,700 30 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 8,393,300 31 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross Receipts 7,464,300 01 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 14,552,100 02 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 5,658,200 03 1154 Shore Fisheries Development Lease Program 522,400 04 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,130,500 05 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 6,251,800 06 1236 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas Project Fund I/A 551,300 07 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $182,599,400 08 Department of Public Safety 09 1002 Federal Receipts 41,124,300 10 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 281,932,900 11 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 7,597,300 12 1007 Interagency Receipts 11,160,600 13 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 2,449,300 14 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 204,400 15 1171 Restorative Justice Account 210,400 16 1220 Crime Victim Compensation Fund 856,400 17 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $345,535,600 18 Department of Revenue 19 1002 Federal Receipts 89,927,400 20 1003 General Fund Match 8,336,000 21 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 24,722,100 22 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,187,200 23 1007 Interagency Receipts 15,085,900 24 1016 CSSD Federal Incentive Payments 1,931,600 25 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 22,267,700 26 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 224,800 27 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 16,471,800 28 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 7,655,800 29 1042 Judicial Retirement System 366,000 30 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia Retirement System 241,000 31 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 9,726,600 01 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 2,977,900 02 1066 Public School Trust Fund 833,800 03 1103 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Receipts 39,728,300 04 1104 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Receipts 1,307,200 05 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross Receipts 230,700,600 06 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 355,000 07 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost Reimbursement 1,093,600 08 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 412,000 09 1256 Education Endowment Fund 1,500 10 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $476,553,800 11 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 12 1002 Federal Receipts 5,599,900 13 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 122,605,300 14 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 6,282,600 15 1007 Interagency Receipts 60,879,900 16 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 40,837,700 17 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 127,904,100 18 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 201,597,400 19 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 2,123,300 20 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 402,000 21 1147 Public Building Fund 15,802,700 22 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 6,625,600 23 1214 Whittier Tunnel Toll Receipts 1,826,300 24 1215 Unified Carrier Registration Receipts 818,600 25 1239 Aviation Fuel Tax Account 4,914,800 26 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 8,979,400 27 1245 Rural Airport Receipts I/A 281,100 28 1249 Motor Fuel Tax Receipts 37,100,800 29 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $644,581,500 30 University of Alaska 31 1002 Federal Receipts 216,257,800 01 1003 General Fund Match 4,777,300 02 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 349,342,700 03 1007 Interagency Receipts 11,116,000 04 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts 313,926,000 05 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 4,181,000 06 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 68,360,000 07 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 133,621,000 08 1234 Special License Plates Receipts 1,000 09 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $1,101,582,800 10 Judiciary 11 1002 Federal Receipts 1,466,000 12 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 149,842,800 13 1007 Interagency Receipts 2,216,700 14 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 335,000 15 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost Reimbursement 339,300 16 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $154,199,800 17 Legislature 18 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 91,214,000 19 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 639,900 20 1007 Interagency Receipts 35,000 21 1171 Restorative Justice Account 210,400 22 * * * Total Agency Funding * * * $92,099,300 23 * * * Total Budget * * * $9,032,886,100 24 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 02 of this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General Funds 05 1003 General Fund Match 936,120,000 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 2,191,772,500 07 * * * Total Unrestricted General Funds * * * $3,127,892,500 08 Designated General Funds 09 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 169,893,200 10 1021 Agricultural Revolving Loan Fund 321,800 11 1031 Second Injury Fund Reserve Account 2,895,500 12 1032 Fishermen's Fund 1,456,700 13 1036 Commercial Fishing Loan Fund 5,043,800 14 1040 Real Estate Recovery Fund 313,000 15 1048 University of Alaska Restricted Receipts 313,926,000 16 1049 Training and Building Fund 815,500 17 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention & Response 15,484,200 18 Fund 19 1054 Employment Assistance and Training Program 9,793,000 20 Account 21 1062 Power Project Loan Fund 1,039,900 22 1070 Fisheries Enhancement Revolving Loan Fund 713,000 23 1074 Bulk Fuel Revolving Loan Fund 64,400 24 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 2,123,300 25 1109 Test Fisheries Receipts 3,666,200 26 1141 Regulatory Commission of Alaska Receipts 13,748,900 27 1151 Technical Vocational Education Program Account 626,700 28 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 5,658,200 29 1154 Shore Fisheries Development Lease Program 522,400 30 1155 Timber Sale Receipts 1,130,500 31 1156 Receipt Supported Services 26,260,300 01 1157 Workers Safety and Compensation Administration 8,032,600 02 Account 03 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission 9,081,300 04 Receipts 05 1164 Rural Development Initiative Fund 67,700 06 1168 Tobacco Use Education and Cessation Fund 5,300,000 07 1169 Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund 1,340,200 08 1170 Small Business Economic Development Revolving 64,100 09 Loan Fund 10 1172 Building Safety Account 2,171,700 11 1200 Vehicle Rental Tax Receipts 12,877,400 12 1201 Commercial Fisheries Entry Commission Receipts 7,172,200 13 1202 Anatomical Gift Awareness Fund 80,000 14 1203 Workers' Compensation Benefits Guarantee Fund 795,500 15 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 1,464,100 16 1221 Civil Legal Services Fund 312,600 17 1223 Commercial Charter Fisheries RLF 21,700 18 1224 Mariculture Revolving Loan Fund 22,100 19 1226 Alaska Higher Education Investment Fund 27,259,200 20 1227 Alaska Microloan Revolving Loan Fund 10,800 21 1234 Special License Plates Receipts 1,000 22 1237 Voc Rehab Small Business Enterprise Revolving 140,000 23 Fund 24 1247 Medicaid Monetary Recoveries 219,800 25 1249 Motor Fuel Tax Receipts 37,100,800 26 * * * Total Designated General Funds * * * $689,031,300 27 Other Non-Duplicated Funds 28 1017 Group Health and Life Benefits Fund 65,267,400 29 1018 Exxon Valdez Oil Spill Trust--Civil 2,763,600 30 1023 FICA Administration Fund Account 220,900 31 1024 Fish and Game Fund 42,310,300 01 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 128,128,900 02 1029 Public Employees Retirement Trust Fund 26,799,100 03 1034 Teachers Retirement Trust Fund 11,621,300 04 1042 Judicial Retirement System 490,200 05 1045 National Guard & Naval Militia Retirement System 539,300 06 1066 Public School Trust Fund 833,800 07 1093 Clean Air Protection Fund 7,599,900 08 1101 Alaska Aerospace Corporation Fund 2,919,400 09 1102 Alaska Industrial Development & Export Authority 10,072,200 10 Receipts 11 1103 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Receipts 39,728,300 12 1104 Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Receipts 1,307,200 13 1105 Permanent Fund Corporation Gross Receipts 241,292,500 14 1106 Alaska Student Loan Corporation Receipts 10,488,700 15 1107 Alaska Energy Authority Corporate Receipts 1,199,000 16 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 162,715,700 17 1117 Randolph Sheppard Small Business Fund 124,200 18 1166 Commercial Passenger Vessel Environmental 1,614,800 19 Compliance Fund 20 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 2,124,600 21 1214 Whittier Tunnel Toll Receipts 1,826,300 22 1215 Unified Carrier Registration Receipts 818,600 23 1230 Alaska Clean Water Administrative Fund 1,050,100 24 1231 Alaska Drinking Water Administrative Fund 1,043,800 25 1239 Aviation Fuel Tax Account 4,914,800 26 1244 Rural Airport Receipts 8,979,400 27 1256 Education Endowment Fund 1,500 28 * * * Total Other Non-Duplicated Funds * * * $778,795,800 29 Other Duplicated Funds 30 1007 Interagency Receipts 486,930,800 31 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 40,837,700 01 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 27,518,100 02 1055 Interagency/Oil & Hazardous Waste 1,199,100 03 1061 Capital Improvement Project Receipts 256,996,900 04 1081 Information Services Fund 64,602,800 05 1145 Art in Public Places Fund 30,000 06 1147 Public Building Fund 15,802,700 07 1171 Restorative Justice Account 6,170,800 08 1174 University of Alaska Intra-Agency Transfers 133,621,000 09 1220 Crime Victim Compensation Fund 856,400 10 1235 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas Project Fund 3,243,200 11 1236 Alaska Liquefied Natural Gas Project Fund I/A 551,300 12 1245 Rural Airport Receipts I/A 281,100 13 * * * Total Other Duplicated Funds * * * $1,038,641,900 14 Federal Receipts 15 1002 Federal Receipts 3,373,145,500 16 1014 Donated Commodity/Handling Fee Account 524,800 17 1016 CSSD Federal Incentive Payments 1,931,600 18 1033 Surplus Federal Property Revolving Fund 698,800 19 1043 Federal Impact Aid for K-12 Schools 20,791,000 20 1133 CSSD Administrative Cost Reimbursement 1,432,900 21 * * * Total Federal Receipts * * * $3,398,524,600 22 * * * Total Budget * * * $9,032,886,100 23 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. COST OF JOB RECLASSIFICATIONS. The money appropriated in this Act 02 includes the amount necessary to pay the costs of personal services because of reclassification 03 of job classes during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 04 * Sec. 5. ALASKA AEROSPACE CORPORATION. Federal receipts and other corporate 05 receipts of the Alaska Aerospace Corporation received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 06 2026, that exceed the amount appropriated in sec. 1 of this Act are appropriated to the Alaska 07 Aerospace Corporation for operations for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 08 * Sec. 6. ALASKA COURT SYSTEM. The amount necessary, estimated to be $0, not to 09 exceed $75,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the Judiciary, Commission on 10 Judicial Conduct, for special counsel costs for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 11 * Sec. 7. ALASKA HOUSING FINANCE CORPORATION. (a) The board of directors of 12 the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation anticipates that $37,785,000 of the adjusted change 13 in net assets from the second preceding fiscal year will be available for appropriation for the 14 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 15 (b) The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation shall retain the amount set out in (a) of 16 this section for the purpose of paying debt service for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, in 17 the estimated amount of $3,185,000 for debt service on the bonds authorized under sec. 4, ch. 18 120, SLA 2004. 19 (c) After deductions for the items set out in (b) of this section and deductions for 20 appropriations for operating and capital purposes are made, any remaining balance of the 21 amount set out in (a) of this section for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated to 22 the general fund. 23 (d) All unrestricted mortgage loan interest payments, mortgage loan commitment 24 fees, and other unrestricted receipts received by or accrued to the Alaska Housing Finance 25 Corporation during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and all income earned on assets of 26 the corporation during that period are appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance 27 Corporation to hold as corporate receipts for the purposes described in AS 18.55 and 28 AS 18.56. The corporation shall allocate its corporate receipts between the Alaska housing 29 finance revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund (AS 18.56.710(a)) 30 under procedures adopted by the board of directors. 31 (e) The sum of $800,000,000 is appropriated from the corporate receipts appropriated 01 to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and allocated between the Alaska housing finance 02 revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund (AS 18.56.710(a)) under 03 (d) of this section to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending 04 June 30, 2026, for housing loan programs not subsidized by the corporation. 05 (f) The sum of $30,000,000 is appropriated from the portion of the corporate receipts 06 appropriated to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and allocated between the Alaska 07 housing finance revolving fund (AS 18.56.082) and senior housing revolving fund 08 (AS 18.56.710(a)) under (d) of this section that is derived from arbitrage earnings to the 09 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for housing 10 loan programs and projects subsidized by the corporation. 11 (g) The sum of $20,000,000 in federal receipts is appropriated to the Alaska Housing 12 Finance Corporation, Alaska Sustainable Energy Corporation to support green bank for the 13 fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June, 30, 2028. 14 * Sec. 8. ALASKA INDUSTRIAL DEVELOPMENT AND EXPORT AUTHORITY. The 15 sum of $20,000,000 has been declared available by the Alaska Industrial Development and 16 Export Authority board of directors under AS 44.88.088 for appropriation as the dividend for 17 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. After deductions for appropriations for capital purposes 18 are made, any remaining balance of the amount set out in this section is appropriated from the 19 unrestricted balance in the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority revolving 20 fund (AS 44.88.060), the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority sustainable 21 energy transmission and supply development fund (AS 44.88.660), and the Arctic 22 infrastructure development fund (AS 44.88.810) to the general fund. 23 * Sec. 9. ALASKA PERMANENT FUND. (a) The amount required to be deposited under 24 art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution of the State of Alaska, estimated to be $368,200,000 during the 25 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated to the principal of the Alaska permanent 26 fund in satisfaction of that requirement. 27 (b) The amount necessary, when added to the appropriation made in (a) of this 28 section, to satisfy the deposit described under AS 37.13.010(a)(2), estimated to be 29 $79,500,000, during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated from the general 30 fund to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund. 31 (c) The sum of $3,798,888,398, as calculated under AS 37.13.140(b), is appropriated 01 from the earnings reserve account (AS 37.13.145) as follows: 02 (1) the amount authorized under AS 37.13.145(b) for transfer by the Alaska 03 Permanent Fund Corporation on June 30, 2025, estimated to be $2,504,449,070, to the 04 dividend fund (AS 43.23.045(a)) for the payment of permanent fund dividends and for 05 administrative and associated costs for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026; 06 (2) the remaining balance, estimated to be $1,294,439,328 to the general fund 07 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 08 (d) The income earned during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, on revenue from 09 the sources set out in AS 37.13.145(d), estimated to be $26,525,000, is appropriated to the 10 Alaska capital income fund (AS 37.05.565). 11 * Sec. 10. ALASKA TECHNICAL AND VOCATIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAM 12 ACCOUNT. (a) Four percent of the revenue deposited into the Alaska technical and 13 vocational education program account (AS 23.15.830) in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 14 estimated to be $884,600, is appropriated from the Alaska technical and vocational education 15 program account (AS 23.15.830) to the Department of Education and Early Development for 16 operating expenses of the Galena Interior Learning Academy, for the fiscal year ending 17 June 30, 2026. 18 (b) Sixty-six percent of the revenue deposited into the Alaska technical and vocational 19 education program account (AS 23.15.830) in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated 20 to be $14,596,200, is appropriated from the Alaska technical and vocational education 21 program account (AS 23.15.830) to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development for 22 operating expenses of the following institutions, in the following percentages, for the fiscal 23 year ending June 30, 2026: 24 ESTIMATED 25 INSTITUTION PERCENTAGE AMOUNT 26 Alaska Technical Center 9 percent $1,990,400 27 Alaska Vocational Technical 17 percent 3,759,600 28 Center 29 Northwestern Alaska Career 4 percent 884,600 30 and Technical Center 31 Southwest Alaska Vocational 4 percent 884,600 01 and Education Center 02 Yuut Elitnaurviat - People's 9 percent 1,990,400 03 Learning Center Inc. 04 Partners for Progress in Delta, 3 percent 663,500 05 Inc. 06 Ilisagvik College 6 percent 1,326,900 07 Prince of Wales Community 5 percent 1,105,800 08 Learning Center 09 Sealaska Heritage Institute, Inc. 2 percent 442,300 10 Fairbanks Pipeline Training Center 7 percent 1,548,100 11 (c) Thirty percent of the revenue deposited into the Alaska technical and vocational 12 education program account (AS 23.15.830) in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated 13 to be $6,634,600, is appropriated from the Alaska technical and vocational education program 14 account (AS 23.15.830) to the University of Alaska for operating expenses of the following 15 institutions, in the following percentages, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: 16 ESTIMATED 17 INSTITUTION PERCENTAGE AMOUNT 18 University of Alaska System 25 percent 5,528,800 19 University of Alaska Southeast 5 percent 1,105,800 20 * Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION. (a) The amount necessary to fund the 21 uses of the state insurance catastrophe reserve account described in AS 37.05.289(a) is 22 appropriated from that account to the Department of Administration for those uses for the 23 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 24 (b) The amount necessary to fund the uses of the working reserve account described 25 in AS 37.05.510(a) is appropriated from that account to the Department of Administration for 26 those uses for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 27 (c) The amount necessary to have an unobligated balance of $5,000,000 in the 28 working reserve account described in AS 37.05.510(a) is appropriated from the unexpended 29 and unobligated balance of any appropriation enacted to finance the payment of employee 30 salaries and benefits that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year 31 ending June 30, 2026, to the working reserve account (AS 37.05.510(a)). 01 (d) The amount necessary to maintain, after the appropriation made in (c) of this 02 section, a minimum target claim reserve balance of one and one-half times the amount of 03 outstanding claims in the group health and life benefits fund (AS 39.30.095), estimated to be 04 $10,000,000, is appropriated from the unexpended and unobligated balance of any 05 appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year ending 06 June 30, 2026, to the group health and life benefits fund (AS 39.30.095). 07 (e) The amount necessary to have an unobligated balance of $50,000,000 in the state 08 insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)), after the appropriations made in (c) 09 and (d) of this section, is appropriated from the unexpended and unobligated balance of any 10 appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end of the fiscal year ending 11 June 30, 2026, to the state insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)). 12 (f) If the amount necessary to cover plan sponsor costs, including actuarial costs, for 13 retirement system benefit payment calculations exceeds the amount appropriated for that 14 purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, after all allowable payments from retirement system fund 15 sources, that amount, not to exceed $500,000, is appropriated from the general fund to the 16 Department of Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 17 (g) The amount necessary to cover actuarial costs associated with bills introduced by 18 the legislature, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 19 Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 20 * Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 21 DEVELOPMENT. (a) The unexpended and unobligated balance of federal money 22 apportioned to the state as national forest income that the Department of Commerce, 23 Community, and Economic Development determines would lapse into the unrestricted portion 24 of the general fund on June 30, 2026, under AS 41.15.180(j) is appropriated to home rule 25 cities, first class cities, second class cities, a municipality organized under federal law, or 26 regional educational attendance areas entitled to payment from the national forest income for 27 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to be allocated among the recipients of national forest 28 income according to their pro rata share of the total amount distributed under AS 41.15.180(c) 29 and (d) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 30 (b) If the amount necessary to make national forest receipts payments under 31 AS 41.15.180 exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 01 amount necessary to make national forest receipts payments is appropriated from federal 02 receipts received for that purpose to the Department of Commerce, Community, and 03 Economic Development, revenue sharing, national forest receipts allocation, for the fiscal 04 year ending June 30, 2026. 05 (c) If the amount necessary to make payments in lieu of taxes for cities in the 06 unorganized borough under AS 44.33.020(a)(20) exceeds the amount appropriated for that 07 purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the amount necessary to make those payments is appropriated 08 from federal receipts received for that purpose to the Department of Commerce, Community, 09 and Economic Development, revenue sharing, payment in lieu of taxes allocation, for the 10 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 11 (d) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 42.45.085(a), estimated to 12 be $48,049,800, not to exceed the amount determined under AS 42.45.080(c)(1), is 13 appropriated from the power cost equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)) to the 14 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska Energy 15 Authority, power cost equalization allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 16 (e) The amount received in settlement of a claim against a bond guaranteeing the 17 reclamation of state, federal, or private land, including the plugging or repair of a well, 18 estimated to be $150,000, is appropriated to the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 19 Commission for the purpose of reclaiming the state, federal, or private land affected by a use 20 covered by the bond for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 21 (f) The sum of $1,000,000 is appropriated from program receipts received by the 22 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, division of insurance, 23 under AS 21 to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, 24 division of insurance, for actuarial support for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and 25 June 30, 2027. 26 (g) A sum, estimated to be $180,060 and not to exceed $198,000, is appropriated from 27 the boat receipts collected under AS 05.25.096 in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, to the 28 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment as a grant 29 under AS 37.05.316 to the Alaska Marine Safety Education Association for marine safety 30 education for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 31 (h) The amount of federal receipts received for the reinsurance program under 01 AS 21.55 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated to the Department of 02 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, division of insurance, for the 03 reinsurance program under AS 21.55 for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 04 2027. 05 (i) The unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated to be $225,000, of the 06 appropriation made in sec. 21(b), ch. 16, SLA 2013 (Department of Commerce, Community, 07 and Economic Development, Alaska Energy Authority, emerging energy technology fund - 08 $2,000,000), is reappropriated to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 09 Development, Alaska Energy Authority, for data library administration, hosting, expansion, 10 and digitization. 11 (j) The sum of $10,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department 12 of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska seafood marketing institute, 13 for a comprehensive marketing plan for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2025, June 30, 2026, 14 and June 30, 2027. 15 * Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND EARLY DEVELOPMENT. (a) Fifty 16 percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 17 2026, estimated to be $461,000, is appropriated to the Department of Education and Early 18 Development to be distributed as grants to school districts according to the average daily 19 membership for each school district, adjusted under AS 14.17.410(b)(1)(A) - (D), for the 20 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 21 (b) Federal funds received by the Department of Education and Early Development, 22 education support and administrative services, that exceed the amount appropriated to the 23 Department of Education and Early Development, education support and administrative 24 services, in sec. 1 of this Act are appropriated to the Department of Education and Early 25 Development, education support and administrative services, for that purpose for the fiscal 26 year ending June 30, 2026. 27 (c) The proceeds from the sale of state-owned Mt. Edgecumbe High School land in 28 Sitka by the Department of Education and Early Development or the Department of Natural 29 Resources are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education and Early 30 Development, Mt. Edgecumbe High School, for maintenance and operations for the fiscal 31 year ending June 30, 2026. 01 (d) The amount of the fees collected under AS 28.10.421(a)(3) during the fiscal year 02 ending June 30, 2025, for the issuance of celebrating the arts license plates, less the cost of 03 issuing the license plates, estimated to be $40,000, is appropriated from the general fund to 04 the Department of Education and Early Development, Alaska State Council on the Arts, for 05 administration of the celebrating the arts license plate program for the fiscal year ending 06 June 30, 2026. 07 (e) The sum of $120,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 08 Education and Early Development for the purpose of providing grant funding for the Child 09 and Adult Care Food Program for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and 10 June 30, 2028. 11 * Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH. Federal receipts received during the fiscal year 12 ending June 30, 2026, for Medicaid services are appropriated to the Department of Health, 13 Medicaid services, for Medicaid services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 14 * Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT. (a) If 15 the amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the workers' compensation benefits 16 guaranty fund (AS 23.30.082) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of 17 this Act, the additional amount necessary to pay those benefit payments is appropriated for 18 that purpose from the workers' compensation benefits guaranty fund (AS 23.30.082) to the 19 Department of Labor and Workforce Development, workers' compensation benefits guaranty 20 fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 21 (b) If the amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the second injury fund 22 (AS 23.30.040(a)) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 23 additional amount necessary to make those benefit payments is appropriated for that purpose 24 from the second injury fund (AS 23.30.040(a)) to the Department of Labor and Workforce 25 Development, second injury fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 26 (c) If the amount necessary to pay benefit payments from the fishermen's fund 27 (AS 23.35.060) exceeds the amount appropriated for that purpose in sec. 1 of this Act, the 28 additional amount necessary to make those benefit payments is appropriated for that purpose 29 from the fishermen's fund (AS 23.35.060) to the Department of Labor and Workforce 30 Development, fishermen's fund allocation, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 31 (d) If the amount of contributions received by the Alaska Vocational Technical Center 01 under AS 21.96.070, AS 43.20.014, AS 43.55.019, AS 43.56.018, AS 43.65.018, 02 AS 43.75.018, and AS 43.77.045 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, exceeds the 03 amount appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Alaska 04 Vocational Technical Center, in sec. 1 of this Act, the additional contributions are 05 appropriated to the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, Alaska Vocational 06 Technical Center, Alaska Vocational Technical Center allocation, for the purpose of operating 07 the center for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 08 * Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS. (a) Five 09 percent of the average ending market value in the Alaska veterans' memorial endowment fund 10 (AS 37.14.700) for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2023, June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025, 11 estimated to be $8,859, is appropriated from the Alaska veterans' memorial endowment fund 12 (AS 37.14.700) to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs for the purposes specified 13 in AS 37.14.730(b) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 14 (b) The amount of the fees collected under AS 28.10.421(d) during the fiscal year 15 ending June 30, 2026, for the issuance of special request license plates commemorating 16 Alaska veterans, less the cost of issuing the license plates, estimated to be $6,700, is 17 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Military and Veterans' Affairs for the 18 maintenance, repair, replacement, enhancement, development, and construction of veterans' 19 memorials for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 20 * Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES.(a) The interest earned during 21 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, on the reclamation bond posted by Cook Inlet Energy for 22 operation of an oil production platform in Cook Inlet under lease with the Department of 23 Natural Resources, estimated to be $150,000, is appropriated from interest held in the general 24 fund to the Department of Natural Resources for the purpose of the bond for the fiscal year 25 ending June 30, 2026. 26 (b) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 37.14.820 for the fiscal 27 year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $30,000, is appropriated from the mine 28 reclamation trust fund operating account (AS 37.14.800(a)) to the Department of Natural 29 Resources for those purposes for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 30 (c) The amount received in settlement of a claim against a bond guaranteeing the 31 reclamation of state, federal, or private land, including the plugging or repair of a well, 01 estimated to be $50,000, is appropriated to the Department of Natural Resources for the 02 purpose of reclaiming the state, federal, or private land affected by a use covered by the bond 03 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 04 (d) A sum, estimated to be $274,638 and not to exceed $302,000, is appropriated from 05 the boat receipts collected under AS 05.25.096 in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, to the 06 Department of Natural Resources, division of parks and outdoor recreation, for the boating 07 safety program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 08 * Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES. (a) 09 The proceeds received from the sale of Alaska marine highway system assets during the fiscal 10 year ending June 30, 2026, are appropriated to the Alaska marine highway system vessel 11 replacement fund (AS 37.05.550). 12 (b) The sum of $159,418,400 is appropriated to the Department of Transportation and 13 Public Facilities, Alaska marine highway system, for costs associated with operating the 14 marine highway system for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, from the 15 following sources: 16 (1) $76,242,100 from federal receipts; 17 (2) $61,440,900 from unrestricted general funds; 18 (3) $981,100 from capital improvement project receipts; 19 (4) $20,754,300 from the Alaska marine highway system fund 20 (AS 19.65.060(a)). 21 (c) Section 5, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 77, lines 1 - 4, is amended to read: 22 Sec. 1. The following appropriation items are for operating expenditures from 23 the general fund or other funds as set out in the fiscal year 2025 budget summary for 24 the operating budget by funding source to the agencies named for the purposes 25 expressed [FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR] beginning January 1, 2025 and ending 26 June 30, 2026 [DECEMBER 31, 2025], unless otherwise indicated. 27 (d) The sum of $100,000 is appropriated from the abandoned motor vehicle fund 28 (AS 28.11.110) to the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, highways, aviation, 29 and facilities, for the removal of abandoned vehicles from highways, vehicular ways or areas, 30 and public property for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 31 * Sec. 19. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. (a) The sum of $2,870,300 is appropriated 01 from the general fund to the Office of the Governor, division of elections, for costs associated 02 with conducting the statewide primary and general elections for the fiscal years ending 03 June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027. 04 (b) After the appropriations made in secs. 11(c) - (e) of this Act, the unexpended and 05 unobligated balance of any appropriation that is determined to be available for lapse at the end 06 of the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, not to exceed $3,500,000, is appropriated to the 07 Office of the Governor, office of management and budget, to support the cost of central 08 services agencies that provide services under AS 37.07.080(e)(2) for the fiscal years ending 09 June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, if receipts from approved central services cost allocation 10 methods under AS 37.07.080(e)(2)(B) fall short of the amounts appropriated in this Act. 11 * Sec. 20. BANKCARD SERVICE FEES. (a) The amount necessary to compensate the 12 collector or trustee of fees, licenses, taxes, or other money belonging to the state during the 13 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated for that purpose for the fiscal year ending 14 June 30, 2026, to the agency authorized by law to generate the revenue, from the funds and 15 accounts in which the payments received by the state are deposited. In this subsection, 16 "collector or trustee" includes vendors retained by the state on a contingency fee basis. 17 (b) The amount necessary to compensate the provider of bankcard or credit card 18 services to the state during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated for that 19 purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to each agency of the executive, legislative, 20 and judicial branches that accepts payment by bankcard or credit card for licenses, permits, 21 goods, and services provided by that agency on behalf of the state, from the funds and 22 accounts in which the payments received by the state are deposited. 23 * Sec. 21. DEBT AND OTHER OBLIGATIONS. (a) The amount required to be paid by 24 the state for the principal of and interest on all issued and outstanding state-guaranteed bonds, 25 estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the general fund to the Alaska Housing Finance 26 Corporation for payment of the principal of and interest on those bonds for the fiscal year 27 ending June 30, 2026. 28 (b) The amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption premium, 29 and trustee fees, if any, on bonds issued by the state bond committee under AS 37.15.560 for 30 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $1,080,000, is appropriated from interest 31 earnings of the Alaska clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) to the Alaska clean water fund 01 revenue bond redemption fund (AS 37.15.565). 02 (c) The amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption premium, 03 and trustee fees, if any, on bonds issued by the state bond committee under AS 37.15.560 for 04 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $1,030,500, is appropriated from interest 05 earnings of the Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) to the Alaska drinking water 06 fund revenue bond redemption fund (AS 37.15.565). 07 (d) The sum of 2,792,217 is appropriated from the general fund to the following 08 agencies for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, for payment of debt service on outstanding 09 debt authorized by AS 14.40.257, AS 29.60.700, and AS 42.45.065, respectively, for the 10 following projects: 11 AGENCY AND PROJECT APPROPRIATION AMOUNT 12 (1) University of Alaska $1,218,193 13 Anchorage Community and Technical 14 College Center 15 Juneau Readiness Center/UAS Joint Facility 16 (2) Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 17 (A) Aleutians East Borough/False Pass 214,855 18 small boat harbor 19 (B) City of Valdez harbor renovations 189,625 20 (C) Aleutians East Borough/Akutan 108,178 21 small boat harbor 22 (D) Fairbanks North Star Borough 341,500 23 Eielson AFB Schools, major 24 maintenance and upgrades 25 (E) City of Unalaska Little South America 368,686 26 (LSA) Harbor 27 (3) Alaska Energy Authority 351,180 28 Copper Valley Electric Association 29 cogeneration projects 30 (e) The amount necessary for payment of lease payments and trustee fees relating to 31 certificates of participation issued for real property for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 01 estimated to be $2,893,500, is appropriated from the general fund to the state bond committee 02 for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 03 (f) The sum of $3,303,500 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 04 Administration for the purpose of paying the obligation of the Linny Pacillo Parking Garage 05 in Anchorage to the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 06 2026. 07 (g) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from the 08 specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: 09 (1) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 10 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, estimated to be 11 $2,259,773, from the amount received from the United States Treasury as a result of the 12 American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School Construction Bond 13 interest subsidy payments due on the series 2010B general obligation bonds; 14 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 15 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, after the payment made in 16 (1) of this subsection, estimated to be $2,403,900, from the general fund for that purpose; 17 (3) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 18 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, estimated to be $434,570, 19 from the amount received from the United States Treasury as a result of the American 20 Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Qualified School Construction Bond interest 21 subsidy payments due on the series 2013A general obligation bonds; 22 (4) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 23 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2013A, after the payments made 24 in (3) of this subsection, estimated to be $460,839, from the general fund for that purpose; 25 (5) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 26 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2015B, estimated to be 27 $9,793,875, from the general fund for that purpose; 28 (6) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 29 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016A, estimated to be 30 $6,247,375, from the general fund for that purpose; 31 (7) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 01 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2016B, estimated to be 02 $6,226,875, from the general fund for that purpose; 03 (8) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 04 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, estimated to be 05 $6,971,625, from the general fund for that purpose; 06 (9) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment for arbitrage 07 rebate on State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2020A, estimated to be $4,025,000, 08 from investment earnings on the bond proceeds deposited in the capital project funds for the 09 series 2020A general obligation bonds for that purpose; 10 (10) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 11 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2023A, estimated to be 12 $18,398,750, from the general fund for that purpose; 13 (11) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 14 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024A, estimated to be 15 $5,504,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 16 (12) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 17 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2024B, estimated to be 18 $4,147,000, from the general fund for that purpose; 19 (13) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest on 20 outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2025A, estimated to be 21 $3,956,229, from the general fund for that purpose; 22 (14) the amount necessary for payment of trustee fees on outstanding State of 23 Alaska general obligation bonds, series 2010B, 2013A, 2015B, 2016A, 2016B, 2020A, 24 2023A, 2024A, 2024B, and 2025A, estimated to be $7,500, from the general fund for that 25 purpose; 26 (15) the amount necessary for the purpose of authorizing payment to the 27 United States Treasury for arbitrage rebate and payment of tax penalties on outstanding State 28 of Alaska general obligation bonds, estimated to be $50,000, from the general fund for that 29 purpose; 30 (16) if the proceeds of state general obligation bonds issued are temporarily 31 insufficient to cover costs incurred on projects approved for funding with these proceeds, the 01 amount necessary to prevent this cash deficiency, from the general fund, contingent on 02 repayment to the general fund as soon as additional state general obligation bond proceeds 03 have been received by the state; and 04 (17) if the amount necessary for payment of debt service and accrued interest 05 on outstanding State of Alaska general obligation bonds exceeds the amounts appropriated in 06 this subsection, the additional amount necessary to pay the obligations, from the general fund 07 for that purpose. 08 (h) The following amounts are appropriated to the state bond committee from the 09 specified sources, and for the stated purposes, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: 10 (1) the amount necessary for debt service on outstanding international airports 11 revenue bonds, estimated to be $1,000,000, from the collection of passenger facility charges 12 approved by the Federal Aviation Administration at the Alaska international airports system; 13 (2) the amount necessary for payment of debt service and trustee fees on 14 outstanding international airports revenue bonds, after the payment made in (1) of this 15 subsection, estimated to be $22,935,675, from the International Airports Revenue Fund 16 (AS 37.15.430(a)) for that purpose; and 17 (3) the amount necessary for payment of principal and interest, redemption 18 premiums, and trustee fees, if any, associated with the early redemption of international 19 airports revenue bonds authorized under AS 37.15.410 - 37.15.550, estimated to be 20 $10,000,000, from the International Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)). 21 (i) If federal receipts are temporarily insufficient to cover international airports 22 system project expenditures approved for funding with those receipts, the amount necessary to 23 prevent that cash deficiency, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the general fund to the 24 International Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) for the fiscal year ending June 30, 25 2026, contingent on repayment to the general fund, as soon as additional federal receipts have 26 been received by the state for that purpose. 27 (j) The amount of federal receipts deposited in the International Airports Revenue 28 Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) necessary to reimburse the general fund for international airports 29 system project expenditures, estimated to be $0, is appropriated from the International 30 Airports Revenue Fund (AS 37.15.430(a)) to the general fund. 31 (k) The amount necessary for payment of obligations and fees for the Goose Creek 01 Correctional Center, estimated to be $16,170,163, is appropriated from the general fund to the 02 Department of Administration for that purpose for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 03 (l) The amount necessary, estimated to be $46,509,533, is appropriated to the 04 Department of Education and Early Development for state aid for costs of school construction 05 under AS 14.11.100 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the following sources: 06 (1) $12,300,000 from the School Fund (AS 43.50.140); 07 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 08 subsection, estimated to be $34,209,533 from the general fund. 09 * Sec. 22. FEDERAL AND OTHER PROGRAM RECEIPTS. (a) Federal receipts, designated 10 program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3), information services fund program receipts under 11 AS 44.21.045(b), Exxon Valdez oil spill trust receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(4), receipts of 12 the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, receipts of the Alaska marine highway system fund 13 under AS 19.65.060(a), receipts of the University of Alaska under AS 37.05.146(b)(2), 14 receipts of the highways equipment working capital fund under AS 44.68.210, and receipts of 15 commercial fisheries test fishing operations under AS 37.05.146(c)(20) that are received 16 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and that exceed the amounts appropriated by this 17 Act are appropriated conditioned on compliance with the program review provisions of 18 AS 37.07.080(h). Receipts received under this subsection during the fiscal year ending 19 June 30, 2026, do not include the balance of a state fund on June 30, 2025. 20 (b) If federal or other program receipts under AS 37.05.146 and AS 44.21.045(b) that 21 are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, exceed the amounts appropriated by 22 this Act, the appropriations from state funds for the affected program shall be reduced by the 23 excess if the reductions are consistent with applicable federal statutes. 24 (c) If federal or other program receipts under AS 37.05.146 and AS 44.21.045(b) that 25 are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, fall short of the amounts 26 appropriated by this Act, the affected appropriation is reduced by the amount of the shortfall 27 in receipts. 28 (d) The amount of designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) 29 appropriated in this Act includes the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, 30 of designated program receipts collected under AS 37.05.146(b)(3) for that purpose. 31 * Sec. 23. FUND CAPITALIZATION. (a) The portions of the fees listed in this subsection 01 that are collected during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $16,000, are 02 appropriated to the Alaska children's trust grant account (AS 37.14.205(a)): 03 (1) fees collected under AS 18.50.225, less the cost of supplies, for the 04 issuance of heirloom birth certificates; 05 (2) fees collected under AS 18.50.272, less the cost of supplies, for the 06 issuance of heirloom marriage certificates; 07 (3) fees collected under AS 28.10.421(d) for the issuance of special request 08 Alaska children's trust license plates, less the cost of issuing the license plates. 09 (b) The amount received from fees assessed under AS 05.25.096(a)(5) and (6), civil 10 penalties collected under AS 30.30.015, the sale of vessels under AS 30.30, and donations and 11 other receipts deposited under AS 30.30.096 as program receipts during the fiscal year ending 12 June 30, 2026, less the amount of those program receipts appropriated to the Department of 13 Administration, division of motor vehicles, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated 14 to be $44,500, is appropriated to the derelict vessel prevention program fund (AS 30.30.096). 15 (c) The amount of federal receipts received for disaster relief during the fiscal year 16 ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $9,000,000, is appropriated to the disaster relief fund 17 (AS 26.23.300(a)). 18 (d) The sum of $13,000,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the disaster relief 19 fund (AS 26.23.300(a)). 20 (e) Twenty-five percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b), estimated 21 to be $230,500, is appropriated to the dividend raffle fund (AS 43.23.230(a)). 22 (f) The amount of municipal bond bank receipts determined under AS 44.85.270(h) to 23 be available for transfer by the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority for the fiscal year 24 ending June 30, 2025, estimated to be $0, is appropriated to the Alaska municipal bond bank 25 authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)). 26 (g) If the Alaska Municipal Bond Bank Authority must draw on the Alaska municipal 27 bond bank authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)) because of a default by a borrower, an 28 amount equal to the amount drawn from the reserve is appropriated from the general fund to 29 the Alaska municipal bond bank authority reserve fund (AS 44.85.270(a)). 30 (h) The amount necessary, estimated to be $1,117,206,608, when added to the balance 31 of the public education fund (AS 14.17.300) on June 30, 2025, to fund the total amount for the 01 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of state aid calculated under the public school funding 02 formula under AS 14.17.410(b) is appropriated to the public education fund (AS 14.17.300) 03 from the following sources: 04 (1) $35,070,007 from the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)); 05 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 06 subsection, estimated to be $1,082,136,601, from the general fund. 07 (i) The amount necessary to fund transportation of students under AS 14.09.010 for 08 the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $67,812,273, is appropriated from the 09 general fund to the public education fund (AS 14.17.300). 10 (j) The sum of $22,884,400 is appropriated from the general fund to the regional 11 educational attendance area and small municipal school district school fund 12 (AS 14.11.030(a)). 13 (k) The amount necessary to pay medical insurance premiums for eligible surviving 14 dependents under AS 39.60.040 and the costs of the Department of Public Safety associated 15 with administering the peace officer and firefighter survivors' fund (AS 39.60.010) for the 16 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $50,000, is appropriated from the general 17 fund to the peace officer and firefighter survivors' fund (AS 39.60.010) for that purpose. 18 (l) The amount of federal receipts awarded or received for capitalization of the Alaska 19 clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, less the 20 amount expended for administering the loan fund and other eligible activities, estimated to be 21 $20,258,600, is appropriated from federal receipts to the Alaska clean water fund 22 (AS 46.03.032(a)). 23 (m) The amount necessary to match federal receipts awarded or received for 24 capitalization of the Alaska clean water fund (AS 46.03.032(a)) during the fiscal year ending 25 June 30, 2026, estimated to be $3,797,200, is appropriated to the Alaska clean water fund 26 (AS 46.03.032(a)) from the following sources: 27 (1) the amount available for appropriation from Alaska clean water fund 28 revenue bond receipts, estimated to be $1,075,000; 29 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 30 subsection, not to exceed $2,722,200, from the general fund. 31 (n) The amount of federal receipts awarded or received for capitalization of the 01 Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 02 less the amount expended for administering the loan fund and other eligible activities, 03 estimated to be $32,666,100, is appropriated from federal receipts to the Alaska drinking 04 water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)). 05 (o) The amount necessary to match federal receipts awarded or received for 06 capitalization of the Alaska drinking water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) during the fiscal year 07 ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $5,622,500, is appropriated to the Alaska drinking 08 water fund (AS 46.03.036(a)) from the following sources: 09 (1) the amount available for appropriation from Alaska drinking water fund 10 revenue bond receipts, estimated to be $1,025,500; 11 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this 12 subsection, not to exceed $4,597,000, from the general fund. 13 (p) The amount received under AS 18.67.162 as program receipts, estimated to be 14 $85,000, including donations and recoveries of or reimbursement for awards made from the 15 crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162), during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, 16 is appropriated to the crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162). 17 (q) The sum of $841,500 is appropriated from that portion of the dividend fund 18 (AS 43.23.045(a)) that would have been paid to individuals who are not eligible to receive a 19 permanent fund dividend because of a conviction or incarceration under AS 43.23.005(d) to 20 the crime victim compensation fund (AS 18.67.162) for the purposes of the crime victim 21 compensation fund (AS 18.67.162). 22 (r) An amount equal to the interest earned on amounts in the election fund required by 23 the federal Help America Vote Act, estimated to be $200,000, is appropriated to the election 24 fund for use in accordance with 52 U.S.C. 21004(b)(2). 25 (s) The vaccine assessment program receipts collected under AS 18.09.220 during the 26 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $25,000,000, are appropriated to the vaccine 27 assessment fund (AS 18.09.230). 28 (t) The sum of $30,000,000 is appropriated to the community assistance fund 29 (AS 29.60.850) from the following sources: 30 (1) $2,018,083 from the general fund; and 31 (2) $27,981,917 from the power cost equalization endowment fund 01 (AS 42.45.070). 02 (u) Federal receipts received for fire suppression during the fiscal year ending 03 June 30, 2026, estimated to be $20,500,000, are appropriated to the fire suppression fund 04 (AS 41.15.210) for fire suppression activities. 05 (v) The sum of $28,755,750 is appropriated to the fire suppression fund 06 (AS 41.15.210) for fire suppression activities from the following sources: 07 (1) $3,000,000 from statutory designated program receipts; and 08 (2) $25,755,750 from the general fund. 09 * Sec. 24. FUND TRANSFERS. (a) The federal funds received by the state under 42 U.S.C. 10 6506a(l) or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 not appropriated for grants under AS 37.05.530(d) are 11 appropriated as follows: 12 (1) to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund (art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution 13 of the State of Alaska) and the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)), according to 14 AS 37.05.530(g)(1) and (2); and 15 (2) to the principal of the Alaska permanent fund (art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution 16 of the State of Alaska), the public school trust fund (AS 37.14.110(a)), and the power cost 17 equalization endowment fund (AS 42.45.070(a)), according to AS 37.05.530(g)(3). 18 (b) The loan origination fees collected by the Alaska Commission on Postsecondary 19 Education for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, are appropriated to the origination fee 20 account (AS 14.43.120(u)) within the education loan fund (AS 14.42.210(a)) of the Alaska 21 Student Loan Corporation for the purposes specified in AS 14.43.120(u). 22 (c) An amount equal to 10 percent of the filing fees received by the Alaska Court 23 System during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, estimated to be $312,600, is appropriated 24 from the general fund to the civil legal services fund (AS 37.05.590) for the purpose of 25 making appropriations from the fund to organizations that provide civil legal services to low- 26 income individuals. 27 (d) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 28 prevention account (AS 46.08.010(a)(1)) in the oil and hazardous substance release 29 prevention and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the sources indicated: 30 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 31 mitigation account (AS 46.08.020(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2025, estimated to be 01 $1,047,100, not otherwise appropriated by this Act; 02 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to 03 be $6,000,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.300; and 04 (3) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to 05 be $6,400,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.40.005. 06 (e) The following amounts are appropriated to the oil and hazardous substance release 07 response account (AS 46.08.010(a)(2)) in the oil and hazardous substance release prevention 08 and response fund (AS 46.08.010(a)) from the following sources: 09 (1) the balance of the oil and hazardous substance release response mitigation 10 account (AS 46.08.025(b)) in the general fund on June 30, 2025, estimated to be $700,000, 11 not otherwise appropriated by this Act; and 12 (2) the amount collected for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to 13 be $1,500,000, from the surcharge levied under AS 43.55.201. 14 (f) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, estimated to be 15 $2,000,000, of the Alaska clean water administrative income account (AS 46.03.034(a)(2)) in 16 the Alaska clean water administrative fund (AS 46.03.034) is appropriated to the Alaska clean 17 water administrative operating account (AS 46.03.034(a)(1)) in the Alaska clean water 18 administrative fund (AS 46.03.034). 19 (g) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, estimated to be 20 $1,000,000, of the Alaska drinking water administrative income account (AS 46.03.038(a)(2)) 21 in the Alaska drinking water administrative fund (AS 46.03.038) is appropriated to the Alaska 22 drinking water administrative operating account (AS 46.03.038(a)(1)) in the Alaska drinking 23 water administrative fund (AS 46.03.038). 24 (h) An amount equal to the interest earned on amounts in the special aviation fuel tax 25 account (AS 43.40.010(e)) during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is appropriated to the 26 special aviation fuel tax account (AS 43.40.010(e)). 27 (i) An amount equal to the revenue collected from the following sources during the 28 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $1,273,000, is appropriated to the fish and 29 game fund (AS 16.05.100): 30 (1) range fees collected at shooting ranges operated by the Department of Fish 31 and Game (AS 16.05.050(a)(15)), estimated to be $480,000; 01 (2) receipts from the sale of waterfowl conservation stamp limited edition 02 prints (AS 16.05.826(a)), estimated to be $3,000; 03 (3) fees collected for sanctuary access permits (AS 16.05.050(a)(15)), 04 estimated to be $100,000; and 05 (4) fees collected at hunter, boating, and angling access sites managed by the 06 Department of Natural Resources, division of parks and outdoor recreation, under a 07 cooperative agreement authorized under AS 16.05.050(a)(6), estimated to be $690,000. 08 (j) The amount necessary for the purposes specified in AS 37.14.820 for the fiscal 09 year ending June 30, 2026, estimated to be $30,000, is appropriated from the mine 10 reclamation trust fund income account (AS 37.14.800(a)) to the mine reclamation trust fund 11 operating account (AS 37.14.800(a)). 12 (k) Twenty-five percent of the donations received under AS 43.23.230(b), estimated 13 to be $230,500, is appropriated to the education endowment fund (AS 43.23.220). 14 (l) The unexpended and unobligated balance of the large passenger vessel gaming and 15 gambling tax account (AS 43.35.220) on June 30, 2026, estimated to be $27,934,000, is 16 appropriated to the general fund. 17 (m) The sum of $6,315,507 is appropriated from the general fund to the renewable 18 energy grant fund (AS 42.45.045). 19 * Sec. 25. RETIREMENT SYSTEM FUNDING. (a) The sum of $79,807,000 is 20 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Administration for deposit in the 21 defined benefit plan account in the public employees' retirement system as an additional state 22 contribution under AS 39.35.280 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. 23 (b) The sum of $138,982,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department 24 of Administration for deposit in the defined benefit plan account in the teachers' retirement 25 system as an additional state contribution under AS 14.25.085 for the fiscal year ending 26 June 30, 2026. 27 (c) The sum of $1,175,573 is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 28 Administration to pay benefit payments to eligible members and survivors of eligible 29 members earned under the elected public officers' retirement system for the fiscal year ending 30 June 30, 2026. 31 * Sec. 26. SALARY AND BENEFIT ADJUSTMENTS. (a) The operating budget 01 appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act include amounts for salary and benefit adjustments 02 for public officials, officers, and employees of the executive branch, Alaska Court System 03 employees, employees of the legislature, and legislators and to implement the monetary terms 04 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of the following ongoing collective bargaining 05 agreements: 06 (1) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 07 commissioned public safety officers unit of members within the Department of Transportation 08 and Public Facilities; 09 (2) Public Safety Employees Association, representing the regularly 10 commissioned public safety officers unit of members within the Department of Public Safety; 11 (3) Public Employees Local 71, for the labor, trades, and crafts unit; 12 (4) Alaska Public Employees Association, for the supervisory unit. 13 (b) The operating budget appropriations made to the University of Alaska in sec. 1 of 14 this Act include amounts for salary and benefit adjustments for the fiscal year ending June 30, 15 2026, for university employees who are not members of a collective bargaining unit and to 16 implement the monetary terms for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, of the following 17 collective bargaining agreements: 18 (1) Fairbanks Firefighters Union, IAFF Local 1324; 19 (2) Alaska Higher Education Crafts and Trades Employees, Local 6070; 20 (3) Alaska Graduate Workers Association/UAW. 21 (c) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (a) of this section is not ratified by 22 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit, the appropriations made in this 23 Act applicable to the collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by 24 the amount for that collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source 25 amounts are adjusted accordingly. 26 (d) If a collective bargaining agreement listed in (b) of this section is not ratified by 27 the membership of the respective collective bargaining unit and approved by the Board of 28 Regents of the University of Alaska, the appropriations made in this Act applicable to the 29 collective bargaining unit's agreement are adjusted proportionately by the amount for that 30 collective bargaining agreement, and the corresponding funding source amounts are adjusted 31 accordingly. 01 * Sec. 27. SHARED TAXES AND FEES. (a) An amount equal to the salmon 02 enhancement tax collected under AS 43.76.001 - 43.76.028 in calendar year 2024, estimated 03 to be $4,500,000, and deposited in the general fund under AS 43.76.025(c), is appropriated 04 from the general fund to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic 05 Development for payment in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to qualified regional 06 associations operating within a region designated under AS 16.10.375. 07 (b) An amount equal to the seafood development tax collected under AS 43.76.350 - 08 43.76.399 in calendar year 2024, estimated to be $2,300,000, and deposited in the general 09 fund under AS 43.76.380(d), is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of 10 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payment in the fiscal year ending 11 June 30, 2026, to qualified regional seafood development associations for the following 12 purposes: 13 (1) promotion of seafood and seafood by-products that are harvested in the 14 region and processed for sale; 15 (2) promotion of improvements to the commercial fishing industry and 16 infrastructure in the seafood development region; 17 (3) establishment of education, research, advertising, or sales promotion 18 programs for seafood products harvested in the region; 19 (4) preparation of market research and product development plans for the 20 promotion of seafood and their by-products that are harvested in the region and processed for 21 sale; 22 (5) cooperation with the Alaska Seafood Marketing Institute and other public 23 or private boards, organizations, or agencies engaged in work or activities similar to the work 24 of the organization, including entering into contracts for joint programs of consumer 25 education, sales promotion, quality control, advertising, and research in the production, 26 processing, or distribution of seafood harvested in the region; 27 (6) cooperation with commercial fishermen, fishermen's organizations, 28 seafood processors, the Alaska Fisheries Development Foundation, the Fishery Industrial 29 Technology Center, state and federal agencies, and other relevant persons and entities to 30 investigate market reception to new seafood product forms and to develop commodity 31 standards and future markets for seafood products. 01 (c) An amount equal to the dive fishery management assessment collected under 02 AS 43.76.150 - 43.76.210 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, estimated to be 03 $455,000 and deposited in the general fund is appropriated from the general fund to the 04 Department of Fish and Game for payment in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to the 05 qualified regional dive fishery development association in the administrative area where the 06 assessment was collected. 07 (d) The amount necessary to refund to local governments and other entities their share 08 of taxes and fees collected in the listed fiscal years under the following programs is 09 appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Revenue for payment to local 10 governments and other entities in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026: 11 FISCAL YEAR ESTIMATED 12 REVENUE SOURCE COLLECTED AMOUNT 13 Fisheries business tax (AS 43.75) 2025 $17,908,000 14 Fishery resource landing tax (AS 43.77) 2025 5,994,000 15 Electric and telephone cooperative tax 2026 4,436,000 16 (AS 10.25.570) 17 Liquor license fee (AS 04.11) 2026 790,000 18 Cost recovery fisheries (AS 16.10.455) 2026 0 19 (e) The amount necessary to refund to local governments the full amount of an 20 aviation fuel tax or surcharge collected under AS 43.40 for the fiscal year ending June 30, 21 2026, estimated to be $150,000, is appropriated from the proceeds of the aviation fuel tax or 22 surcharge levied under AS 43.40 to the Department of Revenue for that purpose. 23 (f) The amount necessary to pay the first seven ports of call their share of the tax 24 collected under AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2025 according to AS 43.52.230(b), estimated 25 to be $28,710,000, is appropriated from the commercial vessel passenger tax account 26 (AS 43.52.230(a)) to the Department of Revenue for payment to the ports of call for the fiscal 27 year ending June 30, 2026. 28 (g) If the amount in the commercial vessel passenger tax account (AS 43.52.230(a)) 29 that is derived from the tax collected under AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2025 is less than 30 the amount necessary to pay the first seven ports of call their share of the tax collected under 31 AS 43.52.220 in calendar year 2025 according to AS 43.52.230(b), the appropriation made in 01 (f) of this section shall be reduced in proportion to the amount of the shortfall. 02 * Sec. 28. RATIFICATION OF SMALL AMOUNTS IN STATE ACCOUNTING. The 03 appropriation to each department under this Act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, is 04 reduced to reverse negative account balances in amounts of $1,000 or less for the department 05 in the state accounting system for each prior fiscal year in which a negative account balance 06 of $1,000 or less exists. 07 * Sec. 29. SUPPLEMENTAL CONSTITUTIONAL BUDGET RESERVE FUND. (a) If the 08 unrestricted state revenue available for appropriation in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025, 09 is insufficient to cover the general fund appropriations made for the fiscal year ending 10 June 30, 2025, the amount necessary to balance revenue and general fund appropriations or to 11 prevent a cash deficiency in the general fund, not exceed $200,000,000, is appropriated to the 12 general fund from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of 13 Alaska). 14 (b) The appropriation made in (a) of this section is made under art. IX, sec. 17(c), 15 Constitution of the State of Alaska. 16 * Sec. 30. CONSTITUTIONAL BUDGET RESERVE FUND. (a) Deposits in the budget 17 reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska) for fiscal year 2025 that are 18 made from subfunds and accounts of the operating general fund by operation of art. IX, sec. 19 17(d), Constitution of the State of Alaska, to repay appropriations from the budget reserve 20 fund are appropriated from the budget reserve fund to the subfunds and accounts from which 21 those funds were transferred. 22 (b) If the unrestricted state revenue available for appropriation in the fiscal year 23 ending June 30, 2026, is insufficient to cover the general fund appropriations made for the 24 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the amount necessary to balance revenue and general fund 25 appropriations or to prevent a cash deficiency in the general fund is appropriated to the 26 general fund from the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of 27 Alaska). 28 (c) The appropriations made in (a) and (b) of this section are made under art. IX, sec. 29 17(c), Constitution of the State of Alaska. 30 * Sec. 31. LAPSE OF APPROPRIATIONS. The appropriations made in secs. 9(a), (b), 31 (c)(1), and (d), 11(c) - (e), 18(a), 21(b), (c), and (i), 23, and 24(a) - (k) and (m) of this Act are 01 for the capitalization of funds and do not lapse. 02 * Sec. 32. RETROACTIVITY. The appropriations made in sec. 1 of this Act that 03 appropriate either the unexpended and unobligated balance of specific fiscal year 2025 04 program receipts or the unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of a specified 05 account are retroactive to June 30, 2025, solely for the purpose of carrying forward a prior 06 fiscal year balance. 07 * Sec. 33. Section 32 of this Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). 08 * Sec. 34. Sections 12(i) and (j), 24(d) and (e), and 29 of this Act take effect June 30, 2025. 09 * Sec. 35. Except as provided in secs. 33 and 34 of this Act, this Act takes effect July 1, 10 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.